A-Kid
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often involved in technical match showcases.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, incorporating high-flying moves and submissions.
Signature moves: Omoplata Crossface, Moonsault DDT, Spanish Fly.
Brief description: A-Kid made brief yet notable appearances in wXw, particularly in tournaments like AMBITION. His combination of technical skill and athleticism impressed audiences, positioning him as a standout talent during his tenure.

Absolute Andy
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2005–2022, regular appearances.
Position on the card: Main eventer and multi-time champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with comedic timing and heel antics.
Signature moves: Absolute Kicks (Superkick), F5, Sharpshooter.
Brief description: Absolute Andy is a cornerstone of wXw, renowned for his versatility as both a serious competitor and a comedic heel. His long-standing career with the promotion saw him win several championships and engage in feuds that contributed significantly to wXw’s storytelling.

ACH
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, with participation in tournament matches like 16 Carat Gold.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a focus on athleticism and speed.
Signature moves: Midnight Star (450° splash), Brainbuster, Hero’s Grip (Cradle DDT).
Brief description: ACH brought his dynamic energy to wXw during his appearances, leaving a lasting impression in the 16 Carat Gold tournament. His matches showcased his blend of charisma and aerial techniques, elevating the overall quality of the cards he participated in.

Adam Polak
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2005–2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card and managerial roles.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling with psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Chair-assisted DDT, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Adam Polak was a notable figure in wXw during the mid-2000s, known for his role in hardcore matches and as a manager for heel factions. His presence added layers to feuds and storyline development, often acting as a catalyst for more violent encounters.

Ahmed Chaer
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Early 2000s–2012.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: All-rounder, blending power moves with technical ability.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Chaerplex (Modified T-bone Suplex), Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: A consistent performer in wXw, Ahmed Chaer contributed significantly to the promotion's early years. Known for his adaptability, he participated in various match types and feuds, earning respect as a versatile competitor and key figure in wXw’s growth.

Ahura
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Rule-breaking heel with a mix of technical and unorthodox tactics.
Signature moves: Butterfly Suplex, Running Knee Strike, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Ahura is best known as part of the Pretty Bastards tag team, where he excelled as a heel character. His antics and in-ring skills made him a memorable part of the wXw tag division, contributing to both his team’s success and overall crowd engagement.

Akira Francesco
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2020–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, combining strikes with submission holds.
Signature moves: Frankensteiner, Ankle Lock, Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: Akira Francesco made an impression during his time in wXw, showcasing his technical proficiency and agility. He participated in a series of singles matches that highlighted his potential as a rising star in European wrestling.

Akira Tozawa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2010 and 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card, with standout performances in international showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-energy striker with a mix of comedy and resilience.
Signature moves: Diving Senton, Snap German Suplex, Octopus Stretch.
Brief description: Akira Tozawa brought his unique blend of charisma and in-ring prowess to wXw during his appearances. His matches were crowd-pleasers, combining athleticism and humor, and he became a memorable participant in the promotion’s international events.

Alexander James
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, with notable involvement in stable-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a focus on European-style wrestling.
Signature moves: Guillotine Choke, Butterfly Suplex, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Alexander James became a prominent figure in wXw during his tenure, often featured in significant storylines and tournaments. His technical skill and heel persona were showcased through his affiliation with stables like Ringkampf and his participation in high-stakes matches, solidifying his place in the promotion's roster.

Alexander Wolfe
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2004–2015 (as Axel Tischer); sporadic appearances post-WWE tenure in 2021.
Position on the card: From undercard talent to main eventer and eventual wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with European-style techniques.
Signature moves: Death Valley Bomb, Powerbomb, German Suplex.
Brief description: Competing as Axel Tischer during his early years in wXw, Alexander Wolfe rose to prominence through his intense matches and charisma. He became a key figure in the promotion's mid-2010s landscape before transitioning to international fame. His return appearances after WWE maintained his strong connection with the wXw fanbase.

Alpha Kevin
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in comedic and underdog roles.
Wrestling style: Brawler with elements of humor and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Kevin Driver (Sit-out Powerbomb), Stunner, Cannonball Senton.
Brief description: A fan-favorite, Alpha Kevin built his reputation as an underdog with a comedic edge. His charm and ability to connect with the audience made him a mainstay in wXw, where he excelled in character-driven storylines and tag team partnerships, particularly with Melanie Gray.

Alpha Female
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2010–2013.
Position on the card: Upper-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based, utilizing strength and aggression.
Signature moves: Alpha Slam (Spinning Side Slam), Big Boot, Spear.
Brief description: Alpha Female’s limited tenure in wXw showcased her dominance in the women’s division. Her imposing presence and physicality stood out, making her a formidable competitor in her matches.

Amale
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–present.
Position on the card: Mainstay in the women’s division, including championship contention.
Wrestling style: Technical and aggressive with a focus on submissions and strikes.
Signature moves: Hope Breaker (Double Knee Backbreaker), Running Knee, Crossface.
Brief description: As the first-ever French wrestler to hold the wXw Women’s Championship, Amale has been a trailblazer in the promotion. Her in-ring prowess and dedication to advancing the women’s division have made her a central figure in wXw’s modern era.

Amboss
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2022–present.
Position on the card: Faction, often featured in upper-mid-card and main event storylines.
Wrestling style: A mix of technical and powerhouse styles, with a focus on faction-based dominance.
Signature moves: Various power moves and faction-assisted strategies.
Brief description: Amboss emerged as one of the prominent factions in wXw, with members excelling in both tag team and singles competition. Their presence brought a blend of intense wrestling and strategic group dominance, playing a central role in wXw’s evolving storylines.

Andrew Everett
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016 and 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, participating in high-flying matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying with acrobatics and speed.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Chokeslam (humorous use in matches), 630° Senton.
Brief description: Known for his athleticism and humor, Andrew Everett made memorable appearances in wXw, often delivering high-energy performances in multi-man matches and tournaments. His style brought excitement and variety to the cards he featured on.

Angelico
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card, involved in tag team and singles action.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on agility and submissions.
Signature moves: Fall of the Angels (Diving double foot stomp), Crucifix Buckle Bomb, Cartwheel DDT.
Brief description: Angelico made a notable impression in wXw with his blend of athleticism and crowd-pleasing maneuvers. His appearances added a dynamic element to the promotion’s cards, particularly in multi-man and showcase matches.

Anil Marik
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2020–present.
Position on the card: Lower to mid-card, primarily in tag team competition and underdog roles.
Wrestling style: Technical and fundamental, with a focus on storytelling and perseverance.
Signature moves: Northern Lights Suplex, Running Crossbody, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A rising star in wXw, Anil Marik has built his career as an underdog with a strong connection to the audience. His improvement in the ring and consistent performances have made him a promising talent within the promotion.

Anthony Henry
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical and hard-hitting matches.
Wrestling style: Striker and submission-based, with a mix of intensity and precision.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Dragon Suplex, Diving Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Anthony Henry showcased his striking and submission prowess during his brief stint in wXw, particularly in matches that emphasized technical skill and physical storytelling. His intensity made him a standout in his limited appearances.

Anti-Fun Police
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Comedic mid-card tag team.
Wrestling style: Comedy wrestling mixed with technical moves and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Splash, Various comedic antics.
Brief description: Represented by Chief Deputy Dunne and Los Federales Santos Jr., the Anti-Fun Police brought their unique blend of humor and technicality to wXw. Their antics added a comedic dynamic to shows, making them a memorable act in the tag team division.

Ares
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2013, with sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, with notable tag team success.
Wrestling style: Technical and psychological, often using calculated heel tactics.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation, Double Underhook Suplex, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Ares is a veteran of wXw, recognized for his tag team success, particularly as a member of the Swiss Money Holding faction. His contributions to the tag division and his technical wrestling acumen left a lasting impact on the promotion.

Arrows of Hungary
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Prominent tag team in the mid-to-upper card.
Wrestling style: High-energy tag team wrestling, combining power and speed.
Signature moves: Crossfire (Double team cannonball), Assisted Moonsault, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Comprised of Icarus and Dover, the Arrows of Hungary have become a dominant force in wXw's tag team division. Their chemistry and innovative offense have earned them accolades and a strong fan following, including reigns as wXw Tag Team Champions.

Aussie Open
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–2022.
Position on the card: Mainstay in the tag team division, including championship contention.
Wrestling style: Power and speed combination, with high-impact double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Corealis (Double team slam), Assisted Cutter, Double Powerbomb.
Brief description: Mark Davis and Kyle Fletcher, known as Aussie Open, quickly established themselves as a top-tier tag team in wXw. Their chemistry, innovative offense, and engaging performances led to significant success in the promotion's tag team division.

Avalanche
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2008–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, including title reigns.
Wrestling style: Power-based, focusing on slams and strikes.
Signature moves: Boulder Dash (Running Crossbody), Powerslam, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Avalanche has been a consistent presence in wXw, evolving from a dominant powerhouse into a beloved fan favorite. His charisma and hard-hitting style have made him a key figure in various storylines, including multiple championship pursuits.

Axel Dieter Jr.
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2008–2017.
Position on the card: Upper card and main eventer, especially as part of Ringkampf.
Wrestling style: Technical grappler with a methodical and precise approach.
Signature moves: Landungsbrücke (Fisherman Suplex), European Uppercut, Crossface.
Brief description: Axel Dieter Jr. was one of the most prominent faces of wXw during his tenure, gaining recognition as part of the Ringkampf faction alongside Walter. His technical skills and storytelling ability elevated the quality of matches and positioned him as a major figure in the promotion's history.

Axel Tischer (Alexander Wolfe)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2004–2015; sporadic appearances post-WWE in 2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event; former wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting brawler with European technical influences.
Signature moves: Death Valley Bomb, German Suplex, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Competing as Axel Tischer before gaining international fame, he rose from the undercard to become a top-tier competitor in wXw. Known for his intensity and ability to adapt to any style, Tischer was a cornerstone of the promotion during the mid-2010s. His return appearances reaffirmed his legacy in wXw.

Axeman
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2007–2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, often in technical showdowns.
Wrestling style: Technical and methodical, emphasizing grappling and suplex variations.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Northern Lights Suplex, Crossface.
Brief description: Axeman carved out a strong reputation in wXw as a skilled technician. His matches were often celebrated for their precision and storytelling, making him a favorite among fans of technical wrestling.

Baby Allison
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2021–present.
Position on the card: Regular in the women’s division and member of the Pretty Bastards faction.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and character-driven, blending technical and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Running Bulldog, Modified DDT, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Baby Allison has quickly become a standout in wXw’s women’s division, combining her unique persona with effective in-ring storytelling. As a member of Pretty Bastards, she adds a dynamic presence to the group, enhancing both her faction and the division.

Bad Bones
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2007–2020, with sporadic appearances.
Position on the card: Main eventer and multi-time wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and aggressive, with a mix of power and speed.
Signature moves: Wrecking Ball Knees, Death Valley Driver, Spear.
Brief description: Bad Bones was a dominant force in wXw for over a decade. Known for his aggressive style and adaptability, he played a crucial role in some of the promotion’s biggest storylines, cementing his status as one of its most decorated stars.

Bandido
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in showcase and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, emphasizing lucha libre techniques.
Signature moves: 21-Plex (Bridging German Suplex after a backflip), Moonsault Slam, Tornillo.
Brief description: Bandido’s brief tenure in wXw showcased his exceptional athleticism and ability to captivate audiences with innovative offense. He participated in key matches that emphasized wXw's connection to international talent, leaving a lasting impression despite limited appearances.

Barish
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Regular appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in character-driven roles.
Wrestling style: Brawler with elements of storytelling and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Lariat, Powerslam.
Brief description: Barish brought a charismatic and energetic presence to wXw, often engaging in matches that highlighted his personality and ability to connect with fans. His consistent performances made him a staple of the promotion during his active years.

Berengar
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2022–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, focusing on singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based, utilizing a combination of strength and technical grappling.
Signature moves: Running Powerslam, Fallaway Slam, Boston Crab.
Brief description: A newer addition to the wXw roster, Berengar has quickly gained attention for his power-based style and in-ring potential. His matches reflect a strong emphasis on traditional wrestling techniques, setting him apart as a promising competitor in the current roster.

Bernard Vandamme
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in European showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Power and technical, with a focus on mat-based grappling.
Signature moves: Double Arm Suplex, Big Boot, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Bernard Vandamme contributed to wXw’s international appeal during his sporadic appearances. Known for his technical prowess and strength, he represented the European wrestling scene effectively in the promotion.

Bernd Föhr
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Lower to mid-card, often in comedic roles.
Wrestling style: Basic technical style, emphasizing character work and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Dropkick, Hip Toss, Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Bernd Föhr was a beloved character in wXw’s earlier years, contributing to the promotion’s lighter moments with his comedic style and charm. Despite his lower-card placement, he remained a fan favorite for his entertaining persona.

Big Daddy Walter (Big Van Walter)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2007–2019.
Position on the card: Main eventer and cornerstone of the promotion. Multi-time wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a focus on strikes and grappling.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Gojira Clutch (Rear Naked Choke), Knife-Edge Chop.
Brief description: Competing under both names, Walter became synonymous with wXw’s success during his tenure. His physical dominance, storytelling ability, and role in the Ringkampf faction made him one of the most iconic figures in the promotion’s history. Walter’s matches were lauded for their intensity and technical excellence, solidifying his legacy as a top-tier talent in wXw.

Big Sick Ben
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in hardcore and brawling matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, with a focus on physicality.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Spinebuster, Chair-assisted DDT.
Brief description: Big Sick Ben was a fixture of wXw’s hardcore scene, participating in violent and chaotic matches that showcased his toughness and ability to thrive in extreme environments. His performances contributed to wXw’s reputation for diverse match styles.

BJ Whitmer
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting, with a focus on suplexes and submissions.
Signature moves: Exploder Suplex, Wrist-Clutch Suplex, Northern Lights Bomb.
Brief description: BJ Whitmer’s appearances in wXw highlighted his experience and technical prowess. His participation in international matches brought a level of prestige to the cards, as he faced off against top talent.

Black Fire
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010–2012.
Position on the card: Lower to mid-card, often featured in fast-paced multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre with a mix of strikes.
Signature moves: 450° Splash, Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Black Fire’s tenure in wXw showcased his speed and high-risk offense. His matches added excitement and variety to the promotion, particularly in the undercard and multi-man environments.

Black Gate Asylum
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily a tag team and faction presence.
Wrestling style: Dark, methodical, and psychologically driven wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Elevated DDT, Various tandem power moves.
Brief description: This faction, known for its eerie presentation, brought a unique character-driven element to wXw. Their performances often combined storytelling with aggressive in-ring tactics, making them a memorable addition to the tag team division.

Bobby Fish
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, with standout singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Hybrid striker and submission specialist.
Signature moves: Fish Hook Deluxe (Heel Hook), Exploder Suplex into Turnbuckles, Falcon Arrow.
Brief description: Bobby Fish impressed during his limited wXw appearances, bringing a blend of technical expertise and striking precision. His matches emphasized his versatility and ability to adapt to any opponent, leaving a strong impression on the audience.

Bobby Gunns
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–present.
Position on the card: Main eventer and multi-time champion, including wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical, submission-based wrestling with a cocky persona.
Signature moves: Gunns Day (Armbar), Cross Armbreaker, German Suplex.
Brief description: A homegrown star of wXw, Bobby Gunns rose through the ranks with his technical skill and brash personality. His championship reigns and ability to connect with the audience as both a heel and a face have cemented his place as one of the modern pillars of the promotion.

Books and Looks
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Comedy tag team in the mid-card.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with a mix of brawling and technical elements.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Neckbreaker, Comedy-based antics.
Brief description: Represented by Jay Skillet and Marius Al-Ani, Books and Looks provided comic relief in wXw's tag team division. Their mix of athleticism and humor resonated with fans, adding variety to the tag team landscape.

Bravado Brothers
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in international tag team showcases.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling with a mix of technical and high-flying moves.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (Double team Suplex), Assisted Moonsault, Doomsday Device variation.
Brief description: Harlem and Lancelot Bravado brought their polished teamwork and charisma to wXw during their appearances. Their performances were highlights in the tag team division, representing a classic tag team style.

Brian Cage
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, with notable showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with high-flying agility, blending strength and athleticism.
Signature moves: Drill Claw (Vertical Suplex Piledriver), Weapon X (Gory Special Flatliner), Discus Lariat.
Brief description: Brian Cage’s brief stint in wXw showcased his unique combination of size, power, and speed. His matches highlighted his versatility and drew attention as a marquee international talent.

Bryan Danielson
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2003 and 2008.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in technical showcases.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-focused, with an emphasis on grappling and counters.
Signature moves: Cattle Mutilation, Regal-Plex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Known globally as one of the best technical wrestlers, Bryan Danielson competed in wXw during his early years, delivering standout performances. His matches were highly acclaimed for their precision and storytelling, contributing to wXw's reputation for high-quality wrestling.

Bubblegum
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Lower to mid-card, primarily in lighthearted matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and character-driven, incorporating humor into his in-ring style.
Signature moves: Bubble Cutter (Springboard Cutter), 450° Splash, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Bubblegum’s appearances in wXw showcased his blend of athleticism and comedic antics. His unique style provided a lighter tone to the promotion's diverse card offerings.

Calamari Catch Kings
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Prominent tag team in the upper mid-card and tournament competition.
Wrestling style: Hybrid technical and striking, focusing on fluid teamwork.
Signature moves: Assisted Octopus Hold, Joint Manipulation Offense, Diving Elbow Smash.
Brief description: Represented by Chris Brookes and Jonathan Gresham, the Calamari Catch Kings became a dynamic and technically proficient team in wXw. They participated in key matches and tournaments, often stealing the show with their innovative and fluid in-ring style.

Cannonball Grizzly
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s (sporadic appearances).
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in hardcore-style matches.
Wrestling style: Brawler with an emphasis on power and hardcore tactics.
Signature moves: Cannonball Splash, Spinebuster, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: A well-known name in European wrestling, Cannonball Grizzly brought his hardcore expertise to wXw in various appearances. His imposing size and aggressive style added a rugged edge to the promotion during its early years.

Cara Noir
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019–2020.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in dramatic, storytelling-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Theatrical and striking-focused, emphasizing character work and psychology.
Signature moves: Swan Woo (Modified Piledriver), Blackout Sleeper, Vicious Superkick.
Brief description: Cara Noir’s appearances in wXw captivated audiences with his unique blend of artistry and brutality. Known for his dramatic entrances and emotional storytelling, he left a strong impression despite a limited tenure.

Carlos Romo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of Team WhiteWolf with A-Kid.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on speed and counters.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Moonsault, Shining Wizard.
Brief description: Carlos Romo was a key figure in wXw’s tag team division during his tenure, forming an exciting partnership with A-Kid. Their matches, known for their fluidity and high spots, made them a fan-favorite duo in the promotion.

Cash Money Erkan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2009–2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, with success in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based, blending strength with heel tactics.
Signature moves: Money Maker (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Spinebuster, Discus Lariat.
Brief description: A consistent presence in wXw, Cash Money Erkan’s charismatic heel persona and power-based offense made him a memorable part of the roster. He competed in several notable feuds and tournaments, solidifying his place in the mid-to-upper card.

Catch Connection
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Tag team division, featured in tournament and mid-card action.
Wrestling style: Hybrid technical and brawling, with an emphasis on teamwork.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Neckbreaker, Corner Splash Combo.
Brief description: Represented by Emil Sitoci and Dirty Dragan, Catch Connection brought a mix of comedy and solid wrestling to wXw. They were known for their character-driven antics and ability to engage the crowd in their tag team bouts.

CCK (Calamari Catch Kings)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2019.
Position on the card: Prominent tag team in the upper card, often in main events and tournaments.
Wrestling style: Technical and innovative, featuring joint manipulation and hard strikes.
Signature moves: Sick F***ing Tag Move (Assisted Lungblower), Octopus Stretch, Double Stomp Variations.
Brief description: Chris Brookes and Kid Lykos, known as CCK, became one of the most celebrated tag teams in wXw. Their chemistry, innovative offense, and charisma helped elevate the tag division during their tenure.

Cedric Alexander
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Agile and high-impact, blending strikes with technical finesse.
Signature moves: Lumbar Check (Backbreaker), Springboard Clothesline, Neuralizer (Springboard Enzuigiri).
Brief description: Cedric Alexander made a brief but impactful impression in wXw with his athletic and hard-hitting performances. His matches showcased his versatility and ability to adapt to a variety of opponents, adding an international flavor to the promotion.

Cem Kaplan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and agile, emphasizing precision strikes and counters.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Enzuigiri, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Cem Kaplan gained recognition in wXw through his involvement in tag teams, most notably with Marius Al-Ani as part of “A4.” Their chemistry and teamwork made them a formidable presence in the division, culminating in a reign as wXw Tag Team Champions.

Cerberus
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2017.
Position on the card: Prominent faction, including tag team and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Dark, brawling-oriented, with a focus on dominance and psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Corner Splash, Powerbomb variations (team moves).
Brief description: Comprised of Ilja Dragunov, Julian Nero, and Avalanche, Cerberus was one of wXw’s most dominant factions. Their mix of brute force and calculated aggression left a significant mark on the promotion, particularly in tag team and faction-based storylines.

Charlie Morgan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and aerial, combining striking with high-risk maneuvers.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Diving Crossbody, Superkick.
Brief description: Charlie Morgan brought her fearless and dynamic style to wXw during her appearances. Competing in the women’s division, her matches were praised for their energy and creativity, adding depth to the roster.

Cheerleader Melissa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, competing in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Grounded and hard-hitting, with technical proficiency.
Signature moves: Kudo Driver, Air Raid Crash, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Cheerleader Melissa’s appearances in wXw showcased her experience and technical prowess. As a respected veteran, she brought credibility and star power to the promotion’s women’s division during her tenure.

Chief Deputy Dunne
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of the Anti-Fun Police.
Wrestling style: Character-driven heel antics combined with technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Rope-Hung DDT, Reverse STO, Modified Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Chief Deputy Dunne’s time in wXw was defined by his work with the Anti-Fun Police, a comedic yet technically sound tag team. Their unique approach to storytelling made them a memorable addition to the tag team division.

Chris Brookes
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2020.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, excelling in tag team and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical with an emphasis on joint manipulation and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Octopus Stretch, Praying Mantis Bomb (Double Underhook Piledriver), Calamari Catch Stretch.
Brief description: Chris Brookes became a standout in wXw as part of CCK (Calamari Catch Kings) alongside Kid Lykos and later Jonathan Gresham. His creative offense and charisma made him a fan favorite in both tag team and singles matches.

Chris Colen
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2008–2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, with stints as Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Power-based, with a mix of technical wrestling and brawling.
Signature moves: Crucifix Powerbomb, Lariat, Full Nelson Slam.
Brief description: Chris Colen enjoyed a successful tenure in wXw, known for his versatility and ability to adapt to different opponents. His championship reigns and contributions to main event storylines solidified his place as one of the promotion’s most dependable stars.

Chris Hero
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2006–2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured as an international star.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of striking and technical wrestling.
Signature moves: Rolling Elbow, Hero’s Welcome (Cravat Cutter), Cyclone Kill (Discus Boot).
Brief description: A globally recognized talent, Chris Hero brought his unique mix of technical expertise and devastating strikes to wXw. His matches, particularly in the 16 Carat Gold tournament, showcased his ability to elevate any card he was part of.

Chris Masters
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured as an international attraction.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with submission-based offense.
Signature moves: Master Lock (Full Nelson), Spinebuster, Gorilla Press Slam.
Brief description: Chris Masters’ appearances in wXw added star power to the promotion’s cards. His imposing physique and mastery of power moves made him a notable international presence in multi-promotion events.

Chris Raaber
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, with sporadic main event appearances.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based, with an emphasis on storytelling.
Signature moves: Double Underhook Suplex, Chokeslam, Belly-to-Belly Suplex.
Brief description: Chris Raaber, also known as “Bambikiller,” contributed to wXw through his versatility and ability to work in various roles. His tenure included feuds and tournament appearances, showcasing his adaptability and in-ring skill.

Chris Ridgeway
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, with notable tournament appearances.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-focused, emphasizing submissions and strong kicks.
Signature moves: Ankle Lock, Roundhouse Kick, Tiger Driver.
Brief description: Chris Ridgeway made a significant impact in wXw through his hard-hitting style and technical precision. His participation in events like AMBITION highlighted his grappling skills, earning him recognition as a top-tier technician in the promotion.

Christian Michael Jakobi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2009–2019.
Position on the card: On-screen authority figure and manager.
Wrestling style: N/A (managerial role).
Signature moves: N/A.
Brief description: As the long-serving promoter and on-screen general manager of wXw, Christian Michael Jakobi was instrumental in shaping the promotion’s modern identity. He also played a key role in managing talent like Ringkampf, adding layers to storylines with his charisma and authority.

Christopher Daniels
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008 and 2009.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, primarily in showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, blending agility with precision.
Signature moves: Angel’s Wings (Double Underhook Facebuster), Best Moonsault Ever, STO.
Brief description: Known globally as “The Fallen Angel,” Christopher Daniels brought his polished in-ring style and star power to wXw during his appearances. His matches with top talent reinforced the promotion’s international appeal and high standards.

Chuck Taylor
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in comedic and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy-infused, with solid technical and aerial elements.
Signature moves: Awful Waffle (Omega Driver), Sole Food (Flatliner), Springboard Senton.
Brief description: Chuck Taylor’s appearances in wXw highlighted his mix of humor and wrestling ability. His participation in multi-man and tag team bouts brought a lighter yet skilled dynamic to the shows.

CIMA
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the early 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured in showcase singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Meteora (Double Knee Drop), Schwein (Modified Michinoku Driver), Iconoclasm.
Brief description: As a pioneer of modern Japanese wrestling, CIMA brought his dynamic style to wXw, captivating fans with his innovative moves and unmatched charisma. His contributions added an international flavor to wXw’s cards, showcasing the promotion’s global reach.

Claudio Castagnoli
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2003–2011, with sporadic appearances afterward.
Position on the card: Main eventer and multi-time champion, including reigns as wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and powerful, with a focus on European uppercuts and grappling.
Signature moves: Neutralizer (Cradle Piledriver), Ricola Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Giant Swing.
Brief description: Claudio Castagnoli, now known as Cesaro, was a cornerstone of wXw during his tenure. His combination of technical skill, charisma, and power elevated the promotion’s in-ring quality and helped cement its reputation on the international stage.

Clint Margera
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore, with a focus on weapons and high-risk moves.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Diving Elbow Drop, Chair-assisted DDT.
Brief description: Clint Margera’s appearances in wXw showcased his expertise in hardcore wrestling. Known for his willingness to endure punishment, he added a gritty edge to the promotion’s cards during his tenure.

Cody Rhodes
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured as an international star.
Wrestling style: Technical and versatile, blending athleticism with storytelling.
Signature moves: Cross Rhodes (Rolling Cutter), Disaster Kick, Figure-Four Leglock.
Brief description: Cody Rhodes brought his star power to wXw during his brief stint in 2017. His matches highlighted his polished style and ability to captivate audiences, further emphasizing wXw’s ability to attract top-tier international talent.

Colt Cabana
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in comedic and character-driven roles.
Wrestling style: Comedy-based wrestling with solid technical fundamentals.
Signature moves: Colt .45 (Double Underhook Suplex Slam), Flying Apple (Corner Elbow), Billy Goat’s Curse (Inverted Boston Crab).
Brief description: Colt Cabana brought humor and charisma to wXw during his appearances. Known for blending comedic antics with technical prowess, his matches provided a lighter yet engaging dynamic to the promotion’s events.

Commonwealth Catch Kings
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Prominent tag team in the mid-to-upper card.
Wrestling style: Technical and innovative, emphasizing teamwork and submissions.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex Variations, Double Knee Smash, Assisted Guillotine.
Brief description: Represented by Chris Ridgeway and Kyle Fletcher, the Commonwealth Catch Kings were a standout team in wXw’s tag division. Their mix of technical expertise and innovative teamwork made them a formidable duo, consistently delivering high-quality matches.

Crazy Sexy Mike
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, frequently in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based and brawling, with elements of charisma and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Crazy Driver (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Running Splash, Lariat.
Brief description: Crazy Sexy Mike is a long-standing figure in wXw, known for his contributions to the tag team division and his partnership with Ahmed Chaer. Together, they formed the "Hot & Spicy" team and later participated in various memorable storylines, showcasing a mix of humor and strong in-ring performances.

Crazy Mary Dobson
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and unorthodox, blending brawling with technical maneuvers.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Missile Dropkick, Spinning Backfist.
Brief description: Crazy Mary Dobson brought her unique and intense style to wXw during her tenure. Her matches in the women’s division were known for their physicality and storytelling, earning her recognition as a standout competitor.

Da Mack
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2009–2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, including tag team success.
Wrestling style: High-flying and charismatic, with a focus on aerial moves and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Mack Magic (Springboard Cutter), Diving Crossbody, Superkick.
Brief description: A product of wXw’s academy, Da Mack rose to prominence with his high-energy style and natural charisma. As a key member of the tag team Hot & Spicy alongside Axel Dieter Jr., he achieved notable success, including a reign as wXw World Tag Team Champion.

Dahlia Black
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striker with a mix of technical and character-driven offense.
Signature moves: Butterfly Suplex, Diving Double Knee Strike, Running Forearm Smash.
Brief description: Dahlia Black brought her intense and character-driven style to wXw’s women’s division. Her performances in singles and multi-women matches stood out for their physicality and storytelling.

Daisuke Harada
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, blending precision and agility.
Signature moves: Katayama German Suplex, Tornado DDT, Top Rope Senton.
Brief description: Daisuke Harada’s limited tenure in wXw showcased his skill as a standout junior heavyweight. His technical and fast-paced matches were highlights of the cards he appeared on, adding an international flair to the promotion.

Daisuke Sekimoto
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2009–2019.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured in marquee singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with technical elements, emphasizing suplexes and strong strikes.
Signature moves: Deadlift German Suplex, Lariat, Boston Crab.
Brief description: A regular visitor from Big Japan Pro Wrestling, Daisuke Sekimoto brought his hard-hitting and powerful style to wXw. His matches, particularly in tournaments like 16 Carat Gold, showcased his ability to elevate the in-ring standard with his physicality and technical prowess.

Damian O’Connor (a.k.a. Big Damo)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2015–2016.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in singles and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling powerhouse with a focus on high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Ulster Plantation (Electric Chair Driver), Senton Splash, Running Crossbody.
Brief description: Damian O’Connor’s tenure in wXw highlighted his imposing size and aggressive in-ring style. His matches were a showcase of brute force, often pitting him against international stars in high-profile bouts.

Daniel Makabe
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical wrestling showcases.
Wrestling style: Grappling-focused, blending submissions with counters and mat-based techniques.
Signature moves: Makabe Lock (Crossface), Wrist-Clutch Suplex, Butterfly Suplex.
Brief description: Daniel Makabe’s time in wXw displayed his technical wrestling acumen and storytelling ability. His bouts in tournaments and showcase matches were celebrated for their strategic pacing and technical execution.

Danny Garnell
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and strike-heavy, with an emphasis on grappling.
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, Snap Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Known for his no-nonsense approach, Danny Garnell brought a straightforward and intense style to wXw. His appearances added variety to the promotion’s cards, particularly in mid-card technical bouts.

Danny Hope
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the mid-2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in comedic and character-driven roles.
Wrestling style: High-energy with a mix of technical and character-driven offense.
Signature moves: Hope for the Best (Swinging Neckbreaker), Diving Elbow Drop, Dropkick.
Brief description: Danny Hope brought his vibrant personality and crowd-engaging style to wXw. Known for his charisma and humorous antics, his matches often added a lighthearted dynamic to the promotion’s cards.

Darkside
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hardcore or extreme matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore, with an emphasis on high-risk maneuvers and weapons.
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, Chair-assisted DDT, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Darkside was a notable competitor in wXw’s hardcore scene, bringing an unorthodox and extreme style to his matches. His performances often involved a mix of high-risk spots and gritty storytelling, resonating with fans of hardcore wrestling.

Dave Mastiff
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2015.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in hard-hitting singles and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with a mix of agility, emphasizing strikes and slams.
Signature moves: Cannonball Senton, Into the Void (Senton Bomb), German Suplex.
Brief description: Dave Mastiff’s tenure in wXw showcased his impressive agility and strength. Known for his physicality, he often delivered standout performances in tournaments like 16 Carat Gold, establishing himself as a force to be reckoned with.

Davey Richards
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in technical and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking-focused, blending submissions with high intensity.
Signature moves: Ankle Lock, Alarm Clock (Kick to Chest), DR Driver (Double Underhook Piledriver).
Brief description: Known for his intense and calculated wrestling style, Davey Richards brought his expertise to wXw during his limited appearances. His matches were a masterclass in technical wrestling, often against other top-tier opponents.

David Starr
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2020.
Position on the card: Main eventer and multi-time champion, including reigns as Shotgun Champion.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with a focus on storytelling and in-ring psychology.
Signature moves: Product Placement (Lifting Side Slam), Cherry Mint DDT, Han Stansen (Lariat).
Brief description: David Starr became one of wXw’s most prominent stars during his tenure. Known for his ability to connect with fans through both his promos and in-ring work, Starr was integral to numerous storylines and tournaments, including 16 Carat Gold.

Debbie Keitel
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card, competing in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striker with a character-driven focus.
Signature moves: Spinning Heel Kick, Modified Neckbreaker, Running Forearm Smash.
Brief description: As part of wXw’s growing women’s division, Debbie Keitel brought a mix of striking and charisma to her performances. Her character work and in-ring abilities added depth to the roster during her tenure.

Delirious
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in comedic and technical matches.
Wrestling style: Unorthodox and high-energy, blending technical wrestling with erratic movements.
Signature moves: Shadows Over Hell (Diving Splash), Panic Attack (Running Knee), Cobra Stretch.
Brief description: Known for his eccentric and unpredictable persona, Delirious brought a unique flavor to wXw during his appearances. His matches were a mix of humor, technical skill, and fast-paced action, making him a standout in multi-man matches.

Demolition Davies
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse and brawler, with a focus on heavy strikes and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Avalanche Splash, Chokeslam, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: A dominant force in wXw’s earlier years, Demolition Davies was known for his imposing size and brutal style. Often competing in hardcore matches, he earned a reputation as one of the promotion’s toughest competitors.

Dennis Dullnig
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2020–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, frequently in comedic and tag team roles.
Wrestling style: Technical with elements of humor and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Double Knee Drop, Running Bulldog.
Brief description: Dennis Dullnig’s charisma and comedic timing have made him a standout in wXw’s current roster. His entertaining persona, combined with solid in-ring abilities, has brought a lighter yet engaging element to the promotion’s shows.

Dezmond Xavier
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced, utilizing aerial maneuvers and agility.
Signature moves: Final Flash (Corkscrew Senton), Spiral Tap, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Dezmond Xavier brought his dynamic and athletic style to wXw, thrilling audiences with his innovative offense. His performances in multi-man and singles matches helped to emphasize wXw’s ability to feature high-quality international talent.

Dick Togo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, involved in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical wrestling and brawling with a mix of high-flying.
Signature moves: Pedigree, Diving Senton, Crossface.
Brief description: A Japanese wrestling legend, Dick Togo brought his vast experience and versatile style to wXw during his appearances. His matches highlighted his adaptability and ability to perform at a high level against a variety of opponents.

Die Schilds
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010s.
Position on the card: Tag team division, featured in mid-card and occasional upper-card matches.
Wrestling style: Power and technical teamwork, emphasizing effective double-team moves.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Powerbomb/Neckbreaker Combo, Corner Splashes.
Brief description: Die Schilds (consisting of Bobby Gunns and Vincent Schild) were a notable tag team in wXw’s division during their tenure. Known for their strong teamwork and chemistry, they were consistent performers who contributed to the division's depth.

Die Prügelbrüder
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Comedy tag team in the mid-card.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with a mix of brawling and lighthearted antics.
Signature moves: Double Lariat, Assisted Splash, Various comedic setups.
Brief description: Die Prügelbrüder were a comedic duo that brought a mix of humor and crowd interaction to their matches. Their performances served as a lighter contrast to the intense wrestling on wXw cards.

Dirty Dragan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2011–2022.
Position on the card: Lower to mid-card, often in comedic and underdog roles.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with a mix of technical and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Dirty Driver (Modified Slam), Rolling Elbow, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A beloved comedic figure in wXw, Dirty Dragan entertained audiences with his humorous antics and underdog storylines. Despite his lighthearted approach, he displayed solid in-ring skills, making him a versatile performer in various roles.

DJ Hyde
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hardcore and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and power-based, utilizing weapons and heavy strikes.
Signature moves: Lariat, Shadow Driver (Spinebuster), Chair-assisted DDT.
Brief description: Known as the head of Combat Zone Wrestling (CZW), DJ Hyde brought his hardcore wrestling style to wXw during crossover events. His matches highlighted the physical and violent aspects of his repertoire, often in specialty bouts.

Dominator
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often featured in powerhouse roles.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a mix of brawling and slams.
Signature moves: Dominator Slam, Big Boot, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Dominator was a consistent performer in wXw’s roster, known for his imposing size and strength. His matches often centered around his ability to dominate opponents physically, solidifying his role as a powerful presence on the card.

Double C
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s.
Position on the card: Lower to mid-card, with occasional tag team roles.
Wrestling style: Basic technical with brawling elements.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Running Clothesline, Powerslam.
Brief description: Double C was a notable part of wXw's early roster, contributing to the promotion’s development during its formative years. His in-ring style and steady presence made him a valuable member of the mid-card.

Doug Williams
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2008–2011.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, competing in technical and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: British technical wrestling, emphasizing grappling and submissions.
Signature moves: Chaos Theory (Rolling German Suplex), Lariat, Dragon Sleeper.
Brief description: Doug Williams brought his legendary British technical style to wXw, where he competed against top-tier talent. His ability to adapt to various opponents and deliver high-quality matches earned him respect during his time in the promotion.

Dover
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, primarily in tag team competition as part of the Arrows of Hungary.
Wrestling style: Power-based with elements of agility.
Signature moves: Crossfire (Double team cannonball with Icarus), Spinebuster, Lariat.
Brief description: As one-half of the Arrows of Hungary, Dover has become a dominant force in wXw’s tag team division. His combination of strength and teamwork with Icarus has made the Arrows one of the most celebrated teams in the promotion.

Drago
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-flying and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre, emphasizing speed and aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Dragon Twist (Springboard Corkscrew Splash), Superkick.
Brief description: Drago’s appearances in wXw brought the flair of lucha libre to the promotion. His exciting style and unique look made him a standout in multi-man bouts and showcase matches.

Drake Younger
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the early 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, specializing in hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, blending high-risk spots with resilience.
Signature moves: Drake’s Landing (Vertebreaker), Death Valley Driver, Exploder Suplex.
Brief description: Known for his hardcore style, Drake Younger competed in some of wXw’s most intense matches during his tenure. His ability to endure punishment and deliver dramatic moments made him a favorite in violent stipulation matches.

Drew Galloway (Drew McIntyre)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured as an international star.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking and brawling elements.
Signature moves: Claymore Kick, Future Shock DDT, Sit-Out Powerbomb.
Brief description: Drew Galloway made a significant impact during his appearances in wXw, showcasing his polished power style and charisma. His matches added star power to the promotion, enhancing its reputation for hosting world-class talent.

Drew Gulak
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016–2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in technical and submission-focused matches.
Wrestling style: Submission and grappling-heavy, emphasizing mat wrestling.
Signature moves: Gu-Lock (Dragon Sleeper with Body Scissors), Northern Lights Suplex, Ankle Lock.
Brief description: Drew Gulak brought his exceptional technical wrestling skills to wXw, participating in tournaments and technical showcases. His precise and methodical approach made his matches standout bouts for fans of grappling and submissions.

Eddie Edwards
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2011 and 2013.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting, with a mix of strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Die Hard (Cross-Legged Fisherman Buster), Boston Knee Party (Running Knee Strike), Achilles Lock.
Brief description: Eddie Edwards brought his signature hybrid style of technical and strike-based wrestling to wXw, competing in high-quality matches against international talent. His presence added prestige to the promotion’s events during his tenure.

Eddie Kingston
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, competing in gritty singles matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and striking, with an emphasis on intensity and storytelling.
Signature moves: Backfist to the Future, Sliding D, Saito Suplex.
Brief description: Eddie Kingston’s passionate promos and hard-hitting style made an impression during his brief tenure in wXw. Known for his authenticity and intensity, Kingston’s matches added emotional weight to the cards he appeared on.

El Generico
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2007–2012.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, with standout singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying lucha libre, combined with technical and crowd-pleasing maneuvers.
Signature moves: Brainbustaaahhh!!!, Helluva Kick, Blue Thunder Bomb.
Brief description: El Generico became a fan favorite in wXw for his electrifying matches and infectious charisma. His involvement in the 16 Carat Gold tournament and his performances against top talent solidified his status as a beloved figure in the promotion’s history.

Eddy Steinblock
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in heavyweight clashes.
Wrestling style: Power-based, focusing on strikes and slams.
Signature moves: Steinblock Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), German Suplex, Lariat.
Brief description: Eddy Steinblock contributed to wXw’s early years as a powerhouse wrestler. Known for his physicality and resilience, he engaged in intense battles that added to the promotion’s diverse roster.

El Lindaman
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in high-energy showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, blending speed with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Tiger Suplex, Lindaman Driver (Modified Suplex Driver), Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, El Lindaman brought his explosive style to wXw, leaving a strong impression with his athleticism and energy. His matches added variety and excitement to the promotion’s cards.

Emil Sitoci
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2006–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, with success in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical and high-flying, emphasizing charisma and storytelling.
Signature moves: Dutch Destroyer (Springboard Cutter), Moonsault, Sit-Out Powerbomb.
Brief description: Emil Sitoci is a long-standing figure in wXw, known for his charisma and versatility. Whether in singles action or as part of tag teams like Catch Connection, Sitoci has delivered consistent performances, becoming a staple of the promotion.

Ender Kara
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2021–present.
Position on the card: Rising star in the mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with a focus on agility and quick counters.
Signature moves: Springboard DDT, Corkscrew Moonsault, Superkick.
Brief description: A promising talent in wXw, Ender Kara has impressed fans with his athleticism and innovative in-ring style. His potential and performances have positioned him as one to watch in the promotion’s current landscape.

Eric Schwarz
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hardcore and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based, with a focus on weapons and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Piledriver, Powerbomb.
Brief description: A veteran of the European wrestling scene, Eric Schwarz brought his no-nonsense brawling style to wXw. Known for his toughness and ability to thrive in hardcore environments, he became a dependable figure in the promotion during his active years.

Eric Young
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured as an international star.
Wrestling style: Versatile, blending technical, brawling, and high-risk maneuvers.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Wheelbarrow Neckbreaker, Piledriver.
Brief description: Eric Young brought his dynamic style and extensive experience to wXw during his appearances. Known for his adaptability and storytelling, he participated in key matches that showcased his talent and added star power to the promotion.

EYFBO (Santana & Ortiz)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-energy tag team wrestling, combining power and speed with innovative double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (Powerbomb and Diving Blockbuster), Double Superkick, Assisted Moonsault.
Brief description: Representing international tag team wrestling excellence, EYFBO (later known as Proud & Powerful) made a strong impression in wXw’s tag team division. Their exciting style and chemistry elevated the quality of the tag team matches they participated in.

EZEL
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card, operating as a stable with a focus on factional dominance.
Wrestling style: Aggressive and character-driven, with an emphasis on faction dynamics.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex Variations, Corner Splashes, Group Beatdowns.
Brief description: EZEL, a faction in wXw led by Metehan, was a significant presence during its run. The group’s intense promos and in-ring aggression added a layer of faction warfare to wXw’s storytelling.

Fast Time Moodo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, with notable tag team success.
Wrestling style: Striking-focused, incorporating martial arts and technical elements.
Signature moves: Spinning Heel Kick, Roundhouse Kick, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Fast Time Moodo has been a key competitor in wXw, known for his martial arts-inspired style and ability to deliver fast-paced, hard-hitting matches. His presence in both singles and tag team competition has added variety to the promotion's roster.

Fenix
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flying, emphasizing acrobatics and agility.
Signature moves: Fire Driver (Muscle Buster into a Piledriver), Springboard Cutter, Tope Con Hilo.
Brief description: Fenix, one of the top lucha libre stars in the world, brought his breathtaking high-flying style to wXw. His matches showcased his incredible agility and innovative offense, making him a standout in multi-man and singles matches.

Fire Ant
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-energy tag matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying with a focus on speed and teamwork.
Signature moves: Beach Break (Scoop Lift Piledriver), Ants Go Marching (Diving Double Stomp), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Representing Chikara, Fire Ant’s time in wXw showcased his fast-paced, high-flying style. His matches were crowd favorites, offering a dynamic and exciting element to the cards he appeared on.

Fit Finlay
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper card, often in hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, emphasizing physicality and grappling.
Signature moves: Celtic Cross (Rolling Fireman’s Carry Slam), Kneebar, Tombstone Piledriver.
Brief description: A legendary figure in wrestling, Fit Finlay brought his gritty and hard-hitting style to wXw. His matches highlighted his vast experience and ability to adapt to various opponents, contributing significantly to the promotion’s prestige.

Flamita
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in high-flying matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flying with precision and speed.
Signature moves: 450° Splash, Spanish Fly, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Flamita’s performances in wXw showcased his world-class athleticism and high-flying prowess. Known for his fluidity and aerial techniques, he brought an international flair to the promotion’s events.

Francesco Akira
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2020–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, blending speed with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Fireball Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Phoenix Splash, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Francesco Akira brought his exciting and innovative style to wXw, quickly making an impression with his athleticism and in-ring charisma. His matches showcased his potential as a rising international star.

Francis Kaspin
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, with success in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Technical with a focus on teamwork and fluid transitions.
Signature moves: Fisherman Suplex, Running European Uppercut, Dropkick.
Brief description: Francis Kaspin became a fan favorite in wXw due to his technical abilities and charisma. His tag team success, particularly as part of Jay FK alongside Jay Skillet, elevated him within the promotion and highlighted his versatility as both a singles and tag competitor.

Fred Yehi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, with a focus on technical wrestling.
Wrestling style: Grappling and striking-heavy, emphasizing submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Koji Clutch, German Suplex, Elbow Strikes.
Brief description: Known for his technical prowess, Fred Yehi competed in wXw as part of its international showcase matches. His ability to blend submissions with innovative counters made him a standout performer during his brief stint.

French Flavour
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–2021.
Position on the card: Tag team division, often in mid-card matches.
Wrestling style: Agile and character-driven, focusing on teamwork and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Crossbody, Tandem Dropkick.
Brief description: French Flavour, comprised of Senza Volto and Aigle Blanc, brought flair and excitement to wXw’s tag team division. Their charismatic personas and innovative offense made them a highlight of the promotion’s tag scene.

Fuminori Abe
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in technical and hard-hitting matches.
Wrestling style: Grappling-focused with strong strikes, blending traditional and innovative techniques.
Signature moves: Manji Gatame (Octopus Hold), Bridging German Suplex, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Fuminori Abe’s brief tenure in wXw showcased his technical precision and striking ability. Known for his versatility, Abe’s performances were highlights of the events he participated in, especially in showcase matches against international talent.

Fynn Freyhart
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, frequently featured in character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with elements of crowd interaction and storytelling.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Running Powerslam, Big Boot.
Brief description: Fynn Freyhart stood out in wXw for his commanding presence and power-based style. His matches were often centered on character-driven storytelling, making him a memorable figure in the mid-card scene during his tenure.

Future Shock (Adam Cole and Kyle O’Reilly)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in tag team showcases.
Wrestling style: A mix of technical grappling and fast-paced tag team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Chasing the Dragon (Brainbuster followed by a Roundhouse Kick), Tandem Superkicks, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Representing ROH and the emerging American indie scene, Future Shock brought their dynamic and innovative tag team wrestling to wXw. Their matches displayed strong chemistry and highlighted their potential as a tag team during their time in the promotion.

Gangrel
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in novelty or special attraction matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and character-driven, utilizing strikes and power moves.
Signature moves: Impaler DDT, Russian Leg Sweep, Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Known for his vampiric persona and WWE fame, Gangrel brought his unique character to wXw during his appearances. His charisma and recognizable gimmick added a nostalgic and entertaining dynamic to the promotion’s events.

Genki Horiguchi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the late 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre and Dragon Gate-inspired high-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: Backslide from Heaven, Beach Break (Scoop Lift Piledriver), Springboard Dropkick.
Brief description: A representative of Dragon Gate, Genki Horiguchi brought his high-energy, fast-paced style to wXw. His appearances helped establish the promotion’s connection to international talent and added excitement to the cards he participated in.

Go Shiozaki
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2011.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Strong-style strikes with an emphasis on chops and power moves.
Signature moves: Go Flasher (Fisherman Driver), Moonsault, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH, Go Shiozaki made a significant impression in wXw with his hard-hitting, physical style. His matches showcased the tenets of strong-style wrestling, leaving a lasting impression on fans.

Grado
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in comedic matches.
Wrestling style: Character-driven and comedic, with basic technical elements.
Signature moves: Wee Boot (Running Big Boot), Roll and Slice (Rolling Senton), F-5.
Brief description: Known for his comedic antics and crowd interaction, Grado brought his entertaining persona to wXw. His performances were a refreshing break from intense matches, providing a lighter tone to the promotion's events.

Gran Akuma
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical and high-flying matches.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of striking and high-flying, blending technical precision with agility.
Signature moves: Falcon Arrow, Yoshi Tonic, Frog Splash.
Brief description: As a representative of Chikara and the U.S. independent scene, Gran Akuma showcased his hybrid style in wXw. His ability to mix striking with aerial maneuvers made him a versatile performer during his appearances.

Gringo Loco
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in high-energy and lucha-style matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying and striking, with innovative offense.
Signature moves: Falcon Arrow, Moonsault, Tornillo.
Brief description: Gringo Loco brought his dynamic and entertaining lucha libre style to wXw during his appearances. His agility and unique moveset provided a fresh flavor to the promotion’s cards, appealing to fans of high-paced, aerial wrestling.

Gulyas Bros
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Tag team division, often in mid-card matches.
Wrestling style: Power and traditional teamwork, emphasizing double-team moves.
Signature moves: Double Powerbomb, Assisted Suplex, Tandem Elbows.
Brief description: The Gulyas Bros showcased their strong tag team chemistry during their appearances in wXw. Known for their power-based style, they brought a classic tag team approach to the promotion's diverse roster.

Gulyas Junior
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition with the Gulyas Bros.
Wrestling style: Power and technical, emphasizing teamwork and strength-based maneuvers.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Double Suplex, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Gulyas Junior, as part of the Gulyas Bros, contributed to wXw’s tag team division with his strong and cohesive performances. His presence added a traditional, power-oriented dynamic to the tag team scene.

Hade Vansen
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on storytelling and psychology.
Signature moves: Rolling Cutter, Spinebuster, Knee Lift.
Brief description: Hade Vansen brought his character work and in-ring storytelling to wXw, standing out for his ability to connect with the audience through his personality and promo skills. His matches were well-received for their psychological depth.

Halal Beefcake
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Character-driven and comedic, blending power and teamwork.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerslam, Tandem Suplex, Running Crossbody.
Brief description: Represented by Jackie Polo and Sha Samuels, Halal Beefcake brought a mix of humor and power-based wrestling to wXw. Their entertaining antics and solid tag team chemistry made them a memorable part of the tag division during their appearances.

Hallowicked
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in character-driven and high-energy matches.
Wrestling style: Hybrid of technical and lucha libre, emphasizing agility and creativity.
Signature moves: Go 2 Sleepy Hollow (Fireman’s Carry Driver), Step-Up Enzuigiri, Superplex.
Brief description: Representing Chikara, Hallowicked’s unique persona and in-ring style made him a standout in wXw. His mix of technical skill and creativity brought a dynamic edge to the matches he participated in.

Hardcore Holly
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the late 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based, with a focus on strikes and slams.
Signature moves: Alabama Slam, Dropkick, Falcon Arrow.
Brief description: A WWE veteran, Hardcore Holly brought his no-nonsense style and experience to wXw. Known for his stiff strikes and intensity, his matches were a highlight for fans seeking physical, hard-hitting wrestling.

HATE
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2019.
Position on the card: Faction-based presence in the mid-card.
Wrestling style: Aggressive and faction-focused, emphasizing teamwork and dominance.
Signature moves: Group Beatdowns, Tandem Powerbombs, Corner Splashes.
Brief description: HATE was a faction that played a significant role in wXw’s mid-card storylines. Known for their aggressive tactics and factional dominance, they were a key part of the promotion’s narrative landscape during their run.

Heddi Karaoui
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the early 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in technical showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Submission and grappling-focused, blending European and Japanese techniques.
Signature moves: Fujiwara Armbar, Butterfly Suplex, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Heddi Karaoui brought his technical expertise and international experience to wXw. His matches highlighted his proficiency in grappling and submission wrestling, earning him recognition among fans of technical styles.

Heisenberg
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2022–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based, emphasizing strength and brawling.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Big Boot, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Heisenberg has made an impact in wXw with his imposing size and power-focused style. Often utilized in tag team and faction-based storylines, he is a rising talent in the promotion's roster.

Hektor Invictus
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, competing in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid, focusing on grappling and striking.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, German Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Hektor Invictus gained recognition in wXw for his versatility and athleticism. His ability to adapt to various opponents made him a key player in mid-card feuds and tournaments during his tenure.

Hideki Suzuki
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, primarily in technical matches.
Wrestling style: Submission and grappling-heavy, with an emphasis on traditional Japanese strong style.
Signature moves: Double Wristlock, Cobra Twist, Saito Suplex.
Brief description: A master of technical wrestling, Hideki Suzuki brought his disciplined, mat-based style to wXw. His matches were a showcase of grappling expertise, adding a distinct element of Japanese strong style to the promotion.

Hiromu Takahashi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and explosive, blending lucha libre with Japanese junior heavyweight techniques.
Signature moves: Time Bomb (Modified Fireman’s Carry Bomb), Sunset Flip Powerbomb, Triangle Choke.
Brief description: Before rising to international stardom in NJPW, Hiromu Takahashi made appearances in wXw, showcasing his unique style and high-energy performances. His matches displayed his agility and charisma, leaving a lasting impression.

Hiroshi Tanahashi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008.
Position on the card: Main event, highlighted as an international star.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on storytelling and pacing.
Signature moves: High Fly Flow (Frog Splash), Dragon Suplex, Sling Blade.
Brief description: As one of the biggest stars in Japanese wrestling, Hiroshi Tanahashi’s appearances in wXw brought significant attention to the promotion. His matches highlighted his world-class ability to tell stories in the ring and elevate his opponents.

Holidead
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based with character-driven elements, emphasizing psychological and physical dominance.
Signature moves: Darkness Falls (Swinging Side Slam), Big Boot, Leg Drop.
Brief description: Holidead brought her eerie and commanding presence to wXw’s women’s division, delivering memorable performances with her mix of power moves and character work. Her unique persona added variety and intrigue to the promotion’s roster.

Hot And Spicy (Axel Dieter Jr. & Da Mack)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2017.
Position on the card: Tag team division, with reigns as wXw World Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, focusing on fast-paced teamwork and fluid double-team moves.
Signature moves: Tandem Dropkick, Assisted DDT, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Hot And Spicy became one of the most popular tag teams in wXw, combining Axel Dieter Jr.’s technical expertise with Da Mack’s agility and charisma. Their reign as tag champions and consistent performances made them a highlight of the division.

Hunter Brothers
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling with a mix of high-flying and technical moves.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Assisted Splash, European Uppercut variations.
Brief description: Lee and Jim Hunter brought their polished teamwork and dynamic in-ring style to wXw. Their appearances in the tag division showcased their ability to deliver exciting matches against a variety of opponents.

Human Tornado
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in comedic and high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and character-driven, blending athleticism with humor.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Pimp Slap, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: Human Tornado’s unique mix of humor, charisma, and high-flying ability made him a memorable figure during his appearances in wXw. His matches were entertaining highlights, often balancing athleticism with comedy.

Hurricane Helms
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often as a special attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing character-driven storytelling.
Signature moves: Eye of the Hurricane (Spinning Headlock Elbow Drop), Vertebreaker, Shining Wizard.
Brief description: Known globally for his superhero persona, Hurricane Helms brought his mix of charisma and polished in-ring style to wXw. His appearances were fan favorites, showcasing his ability to connect with audiences of all ages.

Hyan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2020–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on power and precision.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Falcon Arrow, Lariat.
Brief description: Hyan’s performances in wXw highlighted her skill and versatility as a competitor. Her mix of power and technique added depth to the women’s division, making her a standout during her tenure.

Icarus
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, primarily in tag team competition as part of the Arrows of Hungary.
Wrestling style: Technical and agile, focusing on submissions and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Crossfire (Double team cannonball with Dover), Armbar, Springboard Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Icarus, one-half of the Arrows of Hungary, has been a standout in wXw’s tag team division. His technical prowess and seamless teamwork with Dover have made them one of the premier teams in the promotion, earning championships and widespread acclaim.

Ilja Dragunov
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2012–2019.
Position on the card: Main eventer, multi-time wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Intense and hard-hitting, blending strong-style strikes with technical grappling.
Signature moves: Torpedo Moscow (Running Headbutt), Coast-to-Coast Dropkick, German Suplex.
Brief description: A cornerstone of modern wXw, Ilja Dragunov captivated fans with his unmatched intensity and storytelling ability. His memorable feuds, including his rivalry with Walter, and his championship reigns solidified his legacy as one of the promotion’s all-time greats.

Isami Kodaka
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hardcore and deathmatch-style bouts.
Wrestling style: High-flying and hardcore, with a mix of technical moves.
Signature moves: Isamiashi-zan (Knee Strike), Double Knee Drop, Diving Double Stomp.
Brief description: Representing Big Japan Pro Wrestling, Isami Kodaka brought his trademark mix of high-risk moves and hardcore sensibilities to wXw. His matches showcased his versatility and willingness to push boundaries.

Inner City Machine Guns (Ricochet & Rich Swann)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, primarily in tag team showcases.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative tag team wrestling.
Signature moves: Double Standing Moonsault, Assisted 450 Splash, Tandem Superkicks.
Brief description: The Inner City Machine Guns wowed wXw fans with their dynamic and high-energy style. Their chemistry and innovative offense made them a highlight of the tag division during their appearances.

Italian Dream (Fabio Romano)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, emphasizing strikes and agility.
Signature moves: Italian DDT (Spike DDT), Running Knee Strike, Tornado Suplex.
Brief description: The Italian Dream has quickly made a name for himself in wXw with his charismatic persona and versatile in-ring style. His ability to entertain and deliver solid performances has established him as a reliable mid-card talent.

Iva Kolasky
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2021–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, focusing on quick counters and high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Springboard Crossbody, Snap Suplex, Diving Dropkick.
Brief description: Iva Kolasky has become a prominent figure in wXw’s women’s division, showcasing her athleticism and charisma. Her ability to connect with the audience and deliver strong performances has made her a rising star in the promotion.

Ivan Kiev
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2012–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, with success in tag team and faction-based roles.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Kiev Krusher (Fireman’s Carry into a Facebuster), German Suplex, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Ivan Kiev played a vital role in wXw, particularly as a member of RISE, one of the promotion’s dominant factions. His contributions to factional storylines and tag team success made him a key player during his tenure.

Jack Evans
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in high-flying and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, with innovative aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: 630 Splash, Phoenix Splash, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Jack Evans brought his electrifying high-flying style to wXw, delivering jaw-dropping moves that thrilled audiences. His ability to innovate in the ring made his matches standout highlights during his appearances.

Jack Sexsmith
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in character-driven and underdog roles.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on storytelling and crowd engagement.
Signature moves: Crossface Chickenwing, Diving DDT, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Jack Sexsmith’s unique personality and underdog spirit made him a memorable figure in wXw. His ability to connect with fans through character work and emotional matches left a lasting impression during his appearances.

Jade
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical, emphasizing strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Boston Crab, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Jade’s tenure in wXw showcased her toughness and technical ability. Her matches added depth to the women’s division, highlighting her skill as a reliable competitor.

Jake Crist
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in high-energy singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with a focus on agility and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Spanish Fly, Moonsault.
Brief description: Jake Crist brought his high-energy style to wXw, showcasing his versatility in both singles and tag team competition. His performances highlighted his adaptability and athleticism, making him a standout in multi-man matches.

James Drake
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often featured in tag team competition as part of Grizzled Young Veterans.
Wrestling style: Power and technical, with a focus on striking and teamwork.
Signature moves: Drake’s Landing (Wheelbarrow Stunner), Powerbomb, Lariat.
Brief description: James Drake impressed wXw fans with his commanding presence and cohesive work as part of Grizzled Young Veterans alongside Zack Gibson. Their matches showcased a mix of traditional tag team wrestling and physicality.

James Mason
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in technical wrestling matches.
Wrestling style: British technical, emphasizing grappling and submissions.
Signature moves: Single Leg Crab, Northern Lights Suplex, Drop Toe Hold.
Brief description: A veteran of the British wrestling scene, James Mason brought his classic technical style to wXw. His matches were a showcase of old-school wrestling fundamentals, adding variety to the promotion's cards.

James Storm
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often featured as an international attraction.
Wrestling style: Brawling and striking, blending power and charisma.
Signature moves: Last Call Superkick, Eye of the Storm (Spinning Razor’s Edge), DDT.
Brief description: Known for his time in TNA/Impact Wrestling, James Storm brought his charismatic and hard-hitting style to wXw. His performances as an international star added prestige and excitement to the events he appeared on.

Jaki Numazawa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, specializing in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and high-risk tactics.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Death Valley Driver, Chair-Assisted Dropkick.
Brief description: A representative of Big Japan Pro Wrestling, Jaki Numazawa’s tenure in wXw showcased his willingness to endure punishment in hardcore environments. His matches added an element of chaos and intensity to the cards.

Jaxon Stone
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, emphasizing storytelling and character work.
Signature moves: Rock Breaker (Spinning Reverse STO), Powerbomb, German Suplex.
Brief description: Jaxon Stone brought charisma and versatility to wXw, excelling in both singles and tag team roles. His ability to connect with the audience and deliver consistently strong matches made him a standout during his tenure.

Jay Briscoe
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often in tag team competition as part of The Briscoes.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and brawling, with an emphasis on high-impact moves.
Signature moves: J-Driller (Double Underhook Piledriver), Froggy Bow (Diving Elbow Drop), Superkick.
Brief description: Representing ROH and The Briscoes, Jay Briscoe brought his trademark intensity and tag team expertise to wXw. His matches were celebrated for their physicality and dynamic storytelling.

Jay FK (Jay Skillet & Francis Kaspin)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2019.
Position on the card: Prominent tag team in the upper card, including reigns as wXw World Tag Team Champions.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, emphasizing fluid teamwork and innovative double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Tandem Superkick, Assisted DDT, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Jay FK became one of the premier tag teams in wXw, combining Francis Kaspin’s technical prowess with Jay Skillet’s agility. Their chemistry and dynamic matches solidified their position as top competitors in the tag team division.

Jay Lethal
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2011 and 2014.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in singles and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, blending agility with storytelling.
Signature moves: Lethal Injection (Springboard Cutter), Figure Four Leglock, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: As one of ROH’s standout stars, Jay Lethal brought his world-class skills to wXw. His appearances added prestige to the promotion, with matches that highlighted his blend of athleticism and technical expertise.

Jay Skillet
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, particularly in tag team competition with Francis Kaspin as Jay FK.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with a focus on crowd interaction and speed.
Signature moves: Springboard DDT, Enzuigiri, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Jay Skillet’s tenure in wXw was marked by his success as a tag team competitor. His charisma and agility made him a fan favorite, and his partnership with Francis Kaspin as Jay FK earned them championship gold and critical acclaim.

Jay-AA
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–2020.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card tag team division.
Wrestling style: Power and speed combination, with a focus on impactful double-team moves.
Signature moves: Assisted Spinebuster, Tandem Lariat, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Jay-AA, comprised of Absolute Andy and Jay Skillet, brought a unique mix of power and agility to wXw’s tag team scene. Their contrasting styles and dynamic chemistry made them a formidable team in the division.

Jazzy Bi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2006–2019.
Position on the card: Prominent figure in the women’s division, often in main events.
Wrestling style: Power-based, with an emphasis on strikes and slams.
Signature moves: Dominator, Powerbomb, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: Jazzy Bi, also known as “Alpha Female,” was a trailblazer in wXw’s women’s division. Her imposing presence and dominance in the ring made her one of the most respected and feared competitors in the promotion.

JD Drake
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical, with a focus on strikes and grappling.
Signature moves: Cannonball Senton, Drill Bit (Spinning Brainbuster), Moonsault.
Brief description: JD Drake impressed wXw audiences with his blend of power and technical precision. His matches were lauded for their physicality, showcasing his ability to go toe-to-toe with top-tier talent.

Jeff Cobb
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017–2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in singles and tournament matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, emphasizing suplexes and slams.
Signature moves: Tour of the Islands (Spinning Powerslam), German Suplex, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Jeff Cobb brought his immense power and athleticism to wXw, delivering standout performances in events like the 16 Carat Gold tournament. His ability to blend strength and agility made him a crowd favorite.

Jetta
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, with a focus on submissions.
Signature moves: Guillotine Choke, Sleeper Hold, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Jetta’s technical prowess and engaging persona made her a valuable addition to wXw’s women’s division. Her matches showcased her ability to combine in-ring skill with storytelling.

Jigsaw
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-energy and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with a focus on lucha libre-inspired moves.
Signature moves: Jig ‘n’ Tonic (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Diving Crossbody, Superkick.
Brief description: Representing Chikara, Jigsaw brought his dynamic and crowd-pleasing style to wXw. His ability to mix technical skill with aerial offense made him a standout in multi-man and showcase matches.

Jim Hunter
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the tag team division, alongside Lee Hunter as the Hunter Brothers.
Wrestling style: Traditional tag team wrestling, blending high-flying and technical elements.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Double Dropkick, Assisted Splash.
Brief description: As one-half of the Hunter Brothers, Jim Hunter showcased strong tag team chemistry and dynamic in-ring performances. Their cohesive teamwork and exciting style added depth to wXw’s tag division.

Jimmy Havoc
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances from 2015–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in hardcore or deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and violent tactics.
Signature moves: Acid Rainmaker (Rolling Lariat), Death Valley Driver, Double Foot Stomp.
Brief description: Jimmy Havoc brought his trademark violent style to wXw, excelling in hardcore stipulations. His matches were known for their chaos and storytelling, making him a compelling figure in the promotion during his appearances.

Jimmy Jacobs
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, blending submissions and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Contra Code (Shiranui), Guillotine Choke, Double Stomp.
Brief description: Known for his creativity and storytelling, Jimmy Jacobs brought his unique charisma to wXw. His performances combined technical skill with strong character work, leaving a lasting impression on fans.

Jody Fleisch
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, with innovative aerial techniques.
Signature moves: 720 DDT, Shooting Star Press, Moonsault to the Outside.
Brief description: A pioneer of the British high-flying style, Jody Fleisch thrilled wXw audiences with his incredible agility and creative offense. His matches were a highlight of the cards he participated in, showcasing his groundbreaking athleticism.

Joe E. Legend
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in character-driven roles.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, focusing on storytelling.
Signature moves: Legend Cutter (Cutter), Powerbomb, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Joe E. Legend brought his experience and charisma to wXw, delivering entertaining performances in both singles and tag matches. His ability to combine character work with in-ring skill made him a valuable addition to the promotion.

Joe Gacy
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, emphasizing power moves and aggression.
Signature moves: Handspring Lariat, Spinebuster, Crossface.
Brief description: Joe Gacy impressed wXw audiences with his hard-hitting style and strong presence. His matches displayed a mix of brawling and technical skill, making him a standout in the mid-card scene.

Joel Redman
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in technical and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: British technical wrestling, emphasizing grappling and submissions.
Signature moves: Cloverleaf, Superplex, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: A former NXT Tag Team Champion, Joel Redman brought his polished British technical style to wXw. His matches showcased his versatility and strong fundamentals, leaving a positive impression during his brief tenure.

Joey Janela
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in high-energy and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: High-risk and chaotic, blending aerial maneuvers with hardcore elements.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, Superkick, Moonsault.
Brief description: Known as “The Bad Boy,” Joey Janela’s tenure in wXw was defined by his unpredictable and high-risk style. His ability to adapt to hardcore and traditional matches made him a standout during his appearances.

John Klinger
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2005–2020.
Position on the card: Main eventer and multi-time champion, including reigns as wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Brawling with technical elements, focusing on strikes and in-ring psychology.
Signature moves: Shadow Driver (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Superkick, Diving Elbow Drop.
Brief description: Known as “Bad Bones,” John Klinger was a cornerstone of wXw for over a decade. His intensity and ability to excel in both singles and faction-based storylines made him a key figure in the promotion’s history.

John Morrison
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2010 and 2011.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured as an international star.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, blending athleticism with striking.
Signature moves: Starship Pain (Split-Legged Corkscrew Moonsault), Moonlight Drive (Corkscrew Neckbreaker), Superkick.
Brief description: A globally recognized star, John Morrison brought his unique athleticism and flair to wXw. His performances added a high-profile and dynamic element to the events he participated in, thrilling audiences with his innovative style.

John Silver
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, emphasizing speed and agility.
Signature moves: Spin Doctor (Airplane Spin into Powerbomb), Suicide Dive, Running Knee.
Brief description: Known for his compact build and explosive power, John Silver delivered memorable performances in wXw. His ability to combine technical skill with high-impact moves made him a standout in the mid-card scene.

Johnny Gargano
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2013.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, with a focus on storytelling and counters.
Signature moves: Gargano Escape (Crossface), Lawn Dart, Slingshot DDT.
Brief description: Johnny Gargano’s brief tenure in wXw showcased his versatility and ability to deliver dramatic and engaging matches. His technical skill and connection with fans made him a standout during his appearances.

Johnny Kidd
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in technical wrestling showcases.
Wrestling style: British technical, focusing on grappling, counters, and submissions.
Signature moves: Single Leg Crab, Cravate, Arm Drag variations.
Brief description: A legend of British wrestling, Johnny Kidd brought his old-school technical style to wXw. His matches were a clinic in grappling and a nod to classic European wrestling, adding depth and diversity to the promotion.

Jon Moxley
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2010–2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, featured in hardcore and intense singles matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and hardcore, with a mix of technical elements.
Signature moves: Paradigm Shift (Double Underhook DDT), Rear Naked Choke, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Before achieving global fame, Jon Moxley brought his gritty and violent style to wXw. His matches often involved intense storytelling and chaos, making him a compelling figure during his tenure.

Jonah Rock
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in powerhouse matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with agility, focusing on slams and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Jonah Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Moonsault, Lariat.
Brief description: Jonah Rock (now Bronson Reed in WWE) impressed wXw audiences with his unique blend of size and agility. His hard-hitting style made him a standout in singles competition during his appearances.

Jonathan Gresham
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2020.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, excelling in technical and tournament matches.
Wrestling style: Submission and grappling-focused, emphasizing mat-based techniques and counters.
Signature moves: Octopus Stretch, Bridging German Suplex, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Jonathan Gresham became a prominent figure in wXw due to his exceptional technical skills. His participation in tournaments and technical matches earned him widespread acclaim, solidifying his reputation as one of the best technicians in the sport.

Jonny Storm
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-flying and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Agile and fast-paced, with a mix of lucha libre and European influences.
Signature moves: Rewind Rana (Springboard Hurricanrana), Shooting Star Press, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A pioneer of the British high-flying style, Jonny Storm thrilled wXw audiences with his innovative and athletic performances. His matches were a highlight of the cards he participated in, showcasing his international appeal.

Jordan Devlin
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-stakes singles matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, blending agility with hard-hitting offense.
Signature moves: Devlin Side (Fireman’s Carry Side Slam), Package Piledriver, Spanish Fly.
Brief description: Representing Ireland, Jordan Devlin impressed wXw audiences with his technical ability and intensity. His matches showcased his precision and skill, making him a standout in singles competition during his tenure.

Jordynne Grace
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on suplexes and strikes.
Signature moves: Grace Driver (Pumphandle Driver), Vader Bomb, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Jordynne Grace brought her power and physicality to wXw’s women’s division, earning respect for her dominance and charisma. Her performances added variety and strength to the roster during her appearances.

Julian Nero
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in faction-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical, emphasizing strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, German Suplex, Full Nelson Slam.
Brief description: As a key member of the Cerberus faction, Julian Nero was instrumental in factional feuds and storylines. His imposing presence and versatile wrestling style made him a valuable part of wXw’s roster during his tenure.

Julian Pace
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-energy singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on speed and counters.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Springboard Cutter, Dropkick.
Brief description: A graduate of the wXw Wrestling Academy, Julian Pace was known for his agility and crowd-pleasing style. His performances reflected his passion and potential, making him a standout among younger talents in the promotion.

Jun Kasai
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and high-risk tactics.
Signature moves: Pearl Harbor Splash (Diving Splash), Reverse Tiger Driver, Chair-Assisted Dropkick.
Brief description: Known as the "Crazy Monkey," Jun Kasai brought his violent and fearless style to wXw. His hardcore matches delivered extreme action, showcasing his willingness to push boundaries and entertain fans of the genre.

Jurn Simmons
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–present.
Position on the card: Main eventer, multi-time wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Power-based, blending strength, technical skills, and charisma.
Signature moves: Piledriver, Spinebuster, Big Boot.
Brief description: Jurn Simmons has been one of wXw’s top stars, excelling in main event feuds and title matches. His commanding presence, combined with his in-ring abilities, has established him as a cornerstone of the promotion and a fan favorite.

Jushin Thunder Liger
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured as a special international attraction.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing lucha libre-inspired maneuvers.
Signature moves: Liger Bomb (Powerbomb), Shotei Palm Strike, Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: A legend of Japanese wrestling, Jushin Thunder Liger thrilled wXw audiences with his dynamic style and iconic presence. His appearances elevated the prestige of the promotion and drew fans from across the wrestling world.

Juventud Guerrera
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in lucha-style showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flying with technical elements.
Signature moves: 450° Splash, Juvi Driver (Modified Michinoku Driver), Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Known as “The Juice,” Juventud Guerrera brought his high-energy and high-flying style to wXw. His matches highlighted his international star power and contributed to the promotion’s reputation for hosting world-class talent.

KAGETORA
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in technical and high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, blending agility and submission techniques.
Signature moves: Kagenui (Leg-Scissors Driver), Tornado DDT, Flying Armbar.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, KAGETORA’s performances in wXw demonstrated his ability to seamlessly blend speed and technique. His matches were celebrated for their fluidity and creativity, adding an international flair to the promotion’s cards.

Karim Brigante
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based, focusing on strength and traditional wrestling techniques.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerslam, Lariat.
Brief description: Karim Brigante brought his Italian wrestling pedigree to wXw, showcasing his power and solid technical skills. His appearances were well-received, adding international variety to the cards.

Karl Anderson
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, emphasizing power moves and suplexes.
Signature moves: Gun Stun (Cutter), Spinebuster, Sit-Out Powerbomb.
Brief description: Before rising to international fame, Karl Anderson competed in wXw, demonstrating his powerful and technically sound style. His matches were a blend of aggression and finesse, leaving a strong impression on fans.

Karsten Beck
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2006–2016.
Position on the card: Main eventer, former wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on storytelling and character work.
Signature moves: Piledriver, German Suplex, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Known as “The Coach,” Karsten Beck was a cornerstone of wXw during his career. His ability to blend in-ring talent with exceptional promo skills made him a standout performer and beloved figure in the promotion’s history.

Kassius Ohno (Chris Hero)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in technical and hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Striking-heavy, combining technical grappling and strong-style offense.
Signature moves: Rolling Elbow, Death Blow (Ripcord Elbow Strike), Cravate Suplex.
Brief description: A key figure in wXw’s early growth, Kassius Ohno delivered high-caliber performances that elevated the promotion’s reputation. His blend of technical prowess and striking ability made him one of the most respected and accomplished wrestlers in wXw history.

Karsten Kretschmer
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in tag team and faction-based matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with brawling elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Big Boot, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Karsten Kretschmer contributed to wXw during its formative years, delivering solid performances in both singles and tag team competition. His power-oriented style made him a reliable competitor in the mid-card scene.

Katsuhiko Nakajima
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2011 and 2012.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in high-profile singles matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style, emphasizing kicks, grappling, and powerful strikes.
Signature moves: Vertical Spike (Brainbuster), Penalty Kick, Northern Lights Suplex.
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH, Katsuhiko Nakajima showcased his precise and hard-hitting style in wXw. His matches, often against other international stars, highlighted his technical ability and striking prowess.

Kay Lee Ray
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, competing in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with a focus on agility and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Swanton Bomb, Tornado DDT, Gory Bomb.
Brief description: Kay Lee Ray brought her dynamic and high-energy style to wXw’s women’s division. Her appearances added excitement and skill, showcasing her as one of the top female competitors during her time in the promotion.

Keith Lee
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in high-profile matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse with agility, blending strength-based moves with high-flying agility.
Signature moves: Spirit Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Pounce, Moonsault.
Brief description: Keith Lee made a significant impact in wXw with his unique combination of size, power, and agility. His ability to deliver awe-inspiring moments made him a fan favorite during his appearances.

Ken Shamrock
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper card, often featured as a special attraction.
Wrestling style: Submission and grappling-heavy, emphasizing MMA-inspired techniques.
Signature moves: Ankle Lock, Belly-to-Belly Suplex, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: A legendary figure in combat sports, Ken Shamrock brought his MMA-inspired wrestling style to wXw. His appearances as a special attraction elevated the promotion’s prestige and gave fans a taste of his intense, technical performances.

Kenbai
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, emphasizing agility and quick counters.
Signature moves: Top Rope Senton, Springboard Hurricanrana, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Representing Michinoku Pro, Kenbai showcased his fast-paced and acrobatic style in wXw. His matches were celebrated for their creativity and excitement, adding international flair to the cards.

Kenny Omega
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the early 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often featured in high-profile singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, blending strikes, counters, and innovative offense.
Signature moves: One-Winged Angel (Electric Chair Driver), V-Trigger (Knee Strike), Croyt’s Wrath (Electric Chair German Suplex).
Brief description: Before becoming a global superstar, Kenny Omega competed in wXw, showcasing his exceptional in-ring ability and unique charisma. His matches were highlights of the cards, solidifying his reputation as a world-class talent.

KENTA
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008–2009.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured in singles matches and international showcase bouts.
Wrestling style: Strong style with an emphasis on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Go 2 Sleep (Fireman’s Carry Knee Strike), Busaiku Knee Kick, Game Over (Modified STF).
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH, KENTA brought his hard-hitting, intense style to wXw. His matches against top-tier opponents helped elevate the promotion’s profile on the international wrestling stage.

Kevin Roadster
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in tag team and faction-based roles.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on teamwork.
Signature moves: Running Knee Strike, Dropkick, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Kevin Roadster was a dependable competitor in wXw’s mid-card scene. Known for his solid in-ring skills and factional alliances, he contributed to the depth of the roster during his tenure.

Kevin Steen (Kevin Owens)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid, emphasizing striking and agility.
Signature moves: Package Piledriver, Pop-Up Powerbomb, Moonsault.
Brief description: Before achieving stardom in WWE, Kevin Steen showcased his hard-hitting and charismatic style in wXw. His ability to adapt to various match types made him a standout during his appearances.

Kid Fite
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a mix of technical elements, focusing on striking and teamwork.
Signature moves: Running Boot, Brainbuster, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Kid Fite brought his gritty, hard-hitting style to wXw. His performances in tag team and singles competition showcased his toughness and versatility in the ring.

Kid Lykos
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of CCK (Calamari Catch Kings).
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on quick counters and teamwork.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Moonsault, Assisted Codebreaker (with Chris Brookes).
Brief description: As part of CCK, Kid Lykos brought his fast-paced, dynamic style to wXw’s tag team division. His ability to innovate in the ring, combined with his chemistry with Chris Brookes, made him a standout during his appearances.

Killer Kelly
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2021.
Position on the card: Upper card in the women’s division, often featured as a central figure.
Wrestling style: Striking-heavy and technical, emphasizing submissions and aggression.
Signature moves: Dragon Sleeper, Running Dropkick, Fisherman Suplex.
Brief description: A product of the wXw Wrestling Academy, Killer Kelly became a cornerstone of the women’s division. Known for her hard-hitting style and intense presence, she was a prominent competitor in both singles and multi-person matches, earning recognition internationally.

Kim Ray
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2007–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with a focus on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Kimura Lock, Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex.
Brief description: Kim Ray was a consistent performer in wXw, known for his polished technical style and calculated approach. His longevity and versatility made him a reliable figure in the promotion's roster.

Kimber Lee
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-energy, blending strikes with innovative moves.
Signature moves: Alligator Clutch, Swanton Bomb, German Suplex.
Brief description: Kimber Lee brought her experience and charisma to wXw’s women’s division, adding variety to the roster. Her ability to deliver engaging matches made her a valuable addition during her tenure.

Koray
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in singles and factional storylines.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, emphasizing power moves and aggression.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Superkick, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Koray was a key figure in wXw’s mid-card scene, known for his intensity and adaptability. His involvement in faction-based storylines added depth to the promotion’s narratives.

Kotaro Suzuki
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2011.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in singles and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, with an emphasis on speed and precision.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver, Blue Destiny (Fisherman Suplex into a Pin), Phoenix Splash.
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH, Kotaro Suzuki showcased his exceptional technical ability and agility in wXw. His matches were celebrated for their athleticism and storytelling, adding international prestige to the promotion.

Kris Travis
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in tag team and singles competition.
Wrestling style: High-energy and technical, blending agility with striking.
Signature moves: Travis Cutter (Springboard Cutter), Frog Splash, Superkick.
Brief description: Kris Travis brought his vibrant charisma and in-ring skill to wXw, making a strong impression during his appearances. His matches highlighted his agility and ability to connect with fans.

Kris Wolf
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-energy and character-driven, with a focus on speed and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Running Knee Strike, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Kris Wolf’s quirky personality and dynamic in-ring style made her a unique addition to wXw’s women’s division. Her performances were a mix of entertaining antics and solid wrestling.

KUSHIDA
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2014–2015.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in technical and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, focusing on submissions and agility.
Signature moves: Hoverboard Lock (Kimura Lock), Back to the Future (Small Package Driver), Springboard Elbow.
Brief description: Representing NJPW, KUSHIDA brought his world-class technical wrestling to wXw, delivering standout matches against top competitors. His innovative offense and high-energy style made him a fan favorite during his tenure.

Kyle Fletcher
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of Aussie Open.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on teamwork.
Signature moves: Assisted Cutter (with Mark Davis), Michinoku Driver, Frog Splash.
Brief description: As one-half of Aussie Open, Kyle Fletcher has been a dominant force in wXw’s tag team division. His agility and chemistry with Mark Davis have made them one of the premier teams in the promotion.

Kyle O'Reilly
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2011.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical wrestling showcases.
Wrestling style: Technical and strike-heavy, emphasizing submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Guillotine Choke, Brainbuster, Armbar.
Brief description: Representing ROH, Kyle O'Reilly brought his grappling-focused style to wXw. His matches highlighted his ability to blend technical precision with hard-hitting strikes, making him a standout in technical bouts.

La Rotation (Aigle Blanc & Senza Volto)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card, competing in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, emphasizing tandem offense and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Double Springboard Crossbody, Assisted DDT, Tandem Superkicks.
Brief description: La Rotation added a dynamic and acrobatic element to wXw’s tag team division. Their matches were exciting showcases of their innovative teamwork and lucha libre-inspired style.

Lana Austin
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on submissions and character work.
Signature moves: Running Neckbreaker, Superkick, Rear Naked Choke.
Brief description: Lana Austin brought her solid technical skills and engaging personality to wXw’s women’s division. Her matches showcased her versatility and ability to adapt to different opponents.

Lancelot Bravado
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of The Bravado Brothers.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, emphasizing teamwork and storytelling.
Signature moves: Gentleman’s Agreement (Double Underhook Powerbomb), Tandem Suplex, Double Dropkick.
Brief description: As one-half of The Bravado Brothers, Lancelot Bravado brought a mix of technical skill and entertaining character work to wXw. Their cohesive performances added a distinct charm to the tag team division.

Latigo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-energy lucha-style matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre, emphasizing speed and innovative aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Tornillo, Spanish Fly, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: A representative of Mexico’s lucha libre scene, Latigo brought his fast-paced and exciting style to wXw. His matches added a unique international flair to the promotion’s roster.

Laura Di Matteo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, competing in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on submissions.
Signature moves: Guillotine Choke, Running Knee Strike, Snap Suplex.
Brief description: Laura Di Matteo impressed wXw fans with her solid technical skills and gritty in-ring style. Her matches showcased her versatility and adaptability against a variety of opponents in the women’s division.

Laurance Roman
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card, frequently featured in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, focusing on in-ring psychology.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, German Suplex, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: Laurance Roman was a reliable performer in wXw’s mid-card scene. His character work and technical proficiency made him a consistent presence in both singles and faction-based storylines.

Leaders Of The New School (Zack Sabre Jr. & Marty Scurll)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, emphasizing innovative double-team offense.
Signature moves: Tandem Superkicks, Assisted Powerbomb, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Leaders Of The New School brought their innovative and entertaining style to wXw, showcasing their chemistry and technical prowess. Their matches were a highlight of the tag division during their appearances.

Lee Hunter
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of the Hunter Brothers.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, emphasizing teamwork and agility.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Double Dropkick, Assisted Splash.
Brief description: As one-half of the Hunter Brothers, Lee Hunter brought a polished tag team dynamic to wXw. His seamless chemistry with Jim Hunter and agile style made their matches exciting highlights in the tag division.

Leon van Gasteren
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and versatile, focusing on grappling and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Leon Cutter (Springboard Cutter), German Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: A consistent figure in wXw’s roster, Leon van Gasteren became known for his solid in-ring ability and adaptability. His performances were well-received, and he played a key role in building the promotion’s foundation during his tenure.

Leva Bates
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with a mix of technical and high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Shining Wizard, Sleeper Hold, Superkick.
Brief description: Leva Bates brought her engaging personality and solid wrestling ability to wXw’s women’s division. Her character work and entertaining matches made her a memorable addition to the roster during her appearances.

Levaniel
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often featured in comedic and character-driven storylines.
Wrestling style: Striking and character-driven, with a focus on storytelling and humor.
Signature moves: Superkick, Spinebuster, DDT.
Brief description: Known as “The Prince of the Stars,” Levaniel has become a fan favorite in wXw thanks to his charismatic personality and comedic timing. His ability to balance humor with solid in-ring performances has made him a standout on the roster.

Leyla Hirsch
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based, with a focus on grappling and suplexes.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Armbar, Moonsault.
Brief description: Leyla Hirsch impressed wXw audiences with her hard-hitting and precise wrestling style. Her ability to combine power and technical skills made her a standout performer during her tenure.

Lio Rush
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and fast-paced, emphasizing agility and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Final Hour (Frog Splash), Come Up (Springboard Stunner), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Lio Rush brought his electric speed and innovative moves to wXw, captivating fans with his high-energy performances. His appearances showcased his potential as one of wrestling’s most dynamic talents.

Lionheart
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on storytelling and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Rock Bottom, Superkick.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Lionheart delivered solid performances in wXw, combining his in-ring skills with charismatic presence. His matches were noted for their emotional and engaging narratives.

Little Miss Roxxy
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on agility and resilience.
Signature moves: Diving Crossbody, Superkick, Modified Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Little Miss Roxxy brought her vibrant personality and determination to wXw, earning fans’ admiration through her hard-fought matches. Her performances added depth to the women’s division.

London Riots (James Davis & Rob Lynch)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Power-based and aggressive, with a focus on impactful double-team moves.
Signature moves: Riot Shield (Powerbomb/Neckbreaker Combo), Tandem Lariats, Assisted Suplex.
Brief description: The London Riots brought their no-nonsense, hard-hitting style to wXw, making a significant impact in the tag team division. Their chemistry and physicality made them a formidable team during their appearances.

Los Gueros del Cielo (Angélico & Jack Evans)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, primarily in tag team showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative, blending lucha libre with creative double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Double Stomp/450 Splash Combo, Assisted Moonsault, Tandem Superkicks.
Brief description: Representing Mexico’s lucha libre tradition, Los Gueros del Cielo dazzled wXw audiences with their high-flying offense and seamless teamwork. Their matches were highlights of the tag team division during their appearances.

Low Ki
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008–2009.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in singles and international showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, emphasizing stiff kicks and submission holds.
Signature moves: Warrior’s Way (Diving Double Foot Stomp), Ki Krusher (Fisherman Driver), Dragon Sleeper.
Brief description: Known for his intense style and precision, Low Ki brought his world-class ability to wXw. His performances against top-tier opponents elevated the quality of the promotion’s events, making him a standout attraction.

Lucha Brothers (Penta El Zero M & Rey Fenix)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Main event in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, emphasizing athleticism and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Fear Factor (Package Piledriver/Double Stomp Combo), Spike DDT, Superkick Party.
Brief description: The Lucha Brothers wowed wXw audiences with their breathtaking high-flying abilities and innovative tandem maneuvers. Their chemistry and star power made them one of the most exciting tag teams to grace the promotion.

Lucky Kid
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, with significant faction and singles storylines.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, focusing on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Lucky Lock (Crossface), Springboard Cutter, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Lucky Kid became a breakout star in wXw, known for his unique persona and involvement in factions like RISE and Schadenfreude. His emotional storytelling and technical skills made him a fan favorite and a key figure in major storylines.

LuFisto
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based, with hardcore elements.
Signature moves: Burning Hammer, Cannonball Senton, Lufisto Roll (Sliding Forearm).
Brief description: A pioneer in women’s wrestling, LuFisto brought her hard-hitting and versatile style to wXw. Her performances added intensity and credibility to the women’s division during her appearances.

Luke Jacobs
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hard-hitting singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, with a focus on strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Lariat, German Suplex.
Brief description: Luke Jacobs impressed wXw audiences with his physical and hard-hitting approach. His matches showcased his toughness and technical proficiency, marking him as a rising star during his tenure.

Lykos Gym (Kid Lykos & Kid Lykos II)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing speed and innovative teamwork.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Assisted Moonsault, Tandem Dropkick.
Brief description: As an extension of CCK, Lykos Gym brought their exciting, fast-paced style to wXw’s tag team division. Their creative double-team moves and strong chemistry made them a popular addition to the promotion.

M-Dogg (Matt Cross)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative, blending athleticism with lucha libre influences.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: M-Dogg’s athleticism and creative aerial offense made him a standout performer in wXw. His ability to deliver exciting and dynamic matches left a lasting impression on fans during his appearances.

MAD
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Faction-based mid-card roles.
Wrestling style: Aggressive and brawling, emphasizing group tactics and chaos.
Signature moves: Group beatdowns, Tandem Suplexes, Assisted Powerbombs.
Brief description: As a faction, MAD operated as a disruptive force in wXw, often engaging in factional feuds and high-energy brawls. Their presence added an element of unpredictability to the mid-card scene.

Mad Man Pondo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and extreme tactics.
Signature moves: Stop Sign Smash, Piledriver, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Mad Man Pondo brought his hardcore expertise to wXw, participating in chaotic and violent matches that thrilled fans of the genre. His fearless approach and extreme persona made his appearances unforgettable.

Maggot
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in character-driven roles.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on storytelling and character work.
Signature moves: Cutter, Running Knee Strike, DDT.
Brief description: Known for his unique personality and dark charisma, Maggot has carved out a niche for himself in wXw. His performances often emphasize storytelling and character development, making him a compelling figure in the promotion.

Man Like DeReiss
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2020–present.
Position on the card: Rising star in the mid-card.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, blending agility with power-based moves.
Signature moves: Frog Splash, Rolling Elbow, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Man Like DeReiss has quickly gained attention in wXw for his athleticism and charisma. His ability to combine speed, power, and energy has made him one to watch in the promotion’s evolving roster.

Mance Warner
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in brawling and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling with a focus on strikes and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Lariat, Spinebuster, DDT.
Brief description: Known for his Southern brawler style and charm, Mance Warner brought his hard-hitting approach to wXw. His matches showcased his toughness and ability to entertain through a mix of physicality and personality.

Marc Roudin
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2006–2010.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a mix of technical grappling.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, German Suplex, Running Powerslam.
Brief description: Marc Roudin contributed to wXw’s mid-card scene during its earlier years, showcasing a blend of strength and technique. His performances were solid and dependable, helping to bolster the promotion’s growing reputation.

Marius Al-Ani
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–present.
Position on the card: Main eventer, former wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion.
Wrestling style: High-impact and technical, with a focus on speed, power, and submissions.
Signature moves: The Running Powerslam, Armbar, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: A key figure in wXw, Marius Al-Ani has established himself as one of the promotion’s top stars. His athleticism, versatility, and in-ring charisma have made him a standout in both singles and faction-based storylines.

Mark Andrews
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-flying singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, emphasizing speed and innovative maneuvers.
Signature moves: Stundog Millionaire (Cutter), Shooting Star Press, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Mark Andrews thrilled wXw audiences with his electrifying aerial style. His matches were dynamic and crowd-pleasing, making him a memorable presence during his tenure.

Mark Briscoe
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, primarily in tag team competition as part of The Briscoes.
Wrestling style: Brawling with high-flying elements, focusing on high-impact offense and teamwork.
Signature moves: Froggy Bow (Diving Elbow Drop), Death Valley Driver, Big Boot.
Brief description: As one-half of The Briscoes, Mark Briscoe brought his trademark intensity and tag team chemistry to wXw. His hard-hitting and dynamic matches helped elevate the tag division during his appearances.

Mark Davis
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, primarily in tag team competition as part of Aussie Open.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, emphasizing hard-hitting strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Close Your Eyes (Piledriver), Assisted Cutter (with Kyle Fletcher), Spinebuster.
Brief description: As one-half of Aussie Open, Mark Davis has been a dominant force in wXw’s tag team division. His powerful style and chemistry with Kyle Fletcher have made them one of the most celebrated teams in the promotion’s history.

Mark Haskins
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-energy matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Star Armbar (Arm-Trap Crossface), Death Valley Driver, Diving Double Stomp.
Brief description: A standout in the UK scene, Mark Haskins brought his polished technical style and versatility to wXw. His matches were a showcase of agility and precision, earning him recognition among fans of technical wrestling.

Martin Kirby
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in comedic and technical matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, with a mix of humor and innovative moves.
Signature moves: Sable Bomb (Powerbomb), Zoidberg Elbow (Comedic Diving Elbow), Crossface.
Brief description: Known for his comedic timing and technical ability, Martin Kirby entertained wXw audiences with his unique blend of humor and wrestling skill. His charisma made him a fan favorite during his appearances.

Martin Stone (Danny Burch)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical, emphasizing strikes and grappling.
Signature moves: London Bridge (Hanging DDT), German Suplex, Lariat.
Brief description: A veteran of the UK wrestling scene, Martin Stone brought his no-nonsense, hard-hitting style to wXw. His performances showcased his toughness and ability to adapt to various opponents.

Martina (Session Moth Martina)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division, often in comedic and character-driven roles.
Wrestling style: Striking and high-energy, blending humor with solid in-ring work.
Signature moves: Death by Snu Snu (Bronco Buster), Fisherman Suplex, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: Martina’s larger-than-life persona and comedic antics made her a standout in wXw’s women’s division. Her performances balanced humor and wrestling, creating an entertaining dynamic for fans.

Marty Scurll
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, emphasizing submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Crossface Chickenwing, Black Plague (Modified Piledriver), Superkick.
Brief description: Known as "The Villain," Marty Scurll brought his unique charisma and technical wrestling ability to wXw. His performances showcased his ability to blend in-ring storytelling with high-level technical proficiency.

Masaaki Mochizuki
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a focus on strikes and martial arts techniques.
Signature moves: Twister (Tornado Kick), Shin Saikyo High Kick, Triangle Enzuigiri.
Brief description: A representative of Dragon Gate, Masaaki Mochizuki brought his precise and hard-hitting style to wXw. His matches were celebrated for their intensity and technical depth, appealing to fans of Japanese wrestling.

MASADA
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, specializing in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and high-impact tactics.
Signature moves: MASADA Driver (Piledriver), Chair-Assisted Slam, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Known for his extreme style, MASADA brought a hardcore edge to wXw. His violent and chaotic matches provided a stark contrast to the technical and high-flying bouts, making him a unique attraction.

Masashi Takeda
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in deathmatches and hardcore bouts.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and technical, blending grappling with extreme tactics.
Signature moves: U Crash (Fireman’s Carry Slam), Piledriver, German Suplex.
Brief description: A top deathmatch wrestler, Masashi Takeda’s appearances in wXw showcased his fearless and brutal style. His matches pushed the boundaries of violence, earning respect from hardcore wrestling fans.

Masato Tanaka
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008 and 2010.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in high-profile singles matches.
Wrestling style: Power and striking, blending hardcore elements with strong style.
Signature moves: Roaring Elbow, Sliding D (Running Elbow Strike), Diamond Dust.
Brief description: A legend of Japanese wrestling, Masato Tanaka thrilled wXw audiences with his hard-hitting style and charisma. His matches were showcases of his resilience and ability to deliver physical, dramatic encounters.

Masha Slamovich
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, focusing on power and submissions.
Signature moves: White Knight Driver (Air Raid Crash), Cross Armbar, German Suplex.
Brief description: Masha Slamovich impressed wXw fans with her aggressive and powerful style. Her versatility and ability to adapt to different opponents made her a standout performer during her tenure.

Mason Ryan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in power-based singles matches.
Wrestling style: Powerhouse, focusing on strength and impactful slams.
Signature moves: Full Nelson Slam, Big Boot, Powerslam.
Brief description: Known for his time in WWE, Mason Ryan brought his imposing physical presence to wXw. His performances highlighted his strength and charisma, making him a notable addition to the roster during his tenure.

Massive Product (Jurn Simmons & David Starr)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid, emphasizing teamwork and hard-hitting offense.
Signature moves: Assisted Powerbomb, Tandem Lariats, Double Suplex.
Brief description: Combining the power of Jurn Simmons with the technical prowess of David Starr, Massive Product became a dominant force in wXw’s tag team division. Their matches were known for their intensity and storytelling, making them fan favorites.

Matt Cross (M-Dogg)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-flying and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and innovative, blending athleticism with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Moonsault, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: A veteran of the independent scene, Matt Cross brought his exciting and dynamic style to wXw. His matches showcased his ability to captivate audiences with his aerial maneuvers and athleticism.

Matt Jackson (The Young Bucks)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, primarily in tag team competition with Nick Jackson.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, with a focus on teamwork and innovative double-team moves.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck (450 Splash/Moonsault Combo), Superkick Party, IndyTaker (Assisted Spike Tombstone).
Brief description: As one-half of The Young Bucks, Matt Jackson brought high-energy and jaw-dropping double-team maneuvers to wXw. Their matches were highlights of the tag division, showcasing their charisma and global star power.

Matt Riddle
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017–2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in singles and high-profile tournament matches.
Wrestling style: MMA-inspired striking and grappling, emphasizing submissions and suplexes.
Signature moves: Bro Derek (Cradle Tombstone), Bromission (Twister), Floating Bro (Springboard Moonsault).
Brief description: Before rising to prominence in larger promotions, Matt Riddle brought his hard-hitting and technical style to wXw. His matches were characterized by intensity and athleticism, making him a standout during his appearances.

Matt Sydal
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, focusing on aerial maneuvers and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Lightning Spiral, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: A world-renowned high-flyer, Matt Sydal captivated wXw audiences with his incredible agility and smooth in-ring style. His matches added star power and excitement to the cards he participated in.

Matt Tremont
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, specializing in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and extreme tactics.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Cannonball Senton, Chair-Assisted Slam.
Brief description: Known for his expertise in hardcore wrestling, Matt Tremont delivered chaotic and violent matches in wXw. His fearless approach and willingness to endure punishment made him a favorite among hardcore wrestling fans.

Maxi Schneider
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2020.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in tag team and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with a focus on counters and submissions.
Signature moves: Crossface, Snap Suplex, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: A graduate of the wXw Wrestling Academy, Maxi Schneider showcased his solid technical skills and determination in the promotion. His performances reflected his growth as a wrestler, earning him recognition within the roster.

MBM (Michael Bäuml)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles and faction-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Power and technical hybrid, focusing on strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Powerbomb, Spinebuster.
Brief description: MBM has been a consistent figure in wXw, known for his solid in-ring ability and adaptability. His involvement in both singles competition and storylines has made him a reliable performer within the promotion.

Meiko Satomura
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in high-profile matches in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a mix of strikes, grappling, and submissions.
Signature moves: Scorpio Rising (Step-Up Axe Kick), Death Valley Bomb, Cartwheel Knee Drop.
Brief description: A legend in Japanese wrestling, Meiko Satomura brought her hard-hitting and technically refined style to wXw. Her appearances elevated the prestige of the women’s division, showcasing her ability to deliver intense and captivating matches.

Melanie Gray
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2020.
Position on the card: Prominent figure in the women’s division, often in main events.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on submissions and power moves.
Signature moves: Crossface, German Suplex, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: Melanie Gray was a cornerstone of wXw’s women’s division during her tenure, known for her strong character work and solid in-ring performances. She played a vital role in elevating women’s wrestling within the promotion.

Metehan (formerly Lucky Kid)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, featured in factional storylines with RISE and in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on submissions and psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Meteora (Diving Double Knee Strike), Lucky Lock (Crossface), Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Transitioning from Lucky Kid to Metehan, his evolution reflected a darker, more aggressive persona. Metehan became a key figure in wXw, delivering compelling matches and engaging in high-stakes storylines.

Mexxberg
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2009–2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, competing in singles and faction-based matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerbomb, German Suplex.
Brief description: Mexxberg was a dominant competitor in wXw, known for his impressive size and strength. His tenure included memorable feuds and contributions to the promotion’s growth during its formative years.

Michael Dante
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of The Sumerian Death Squad.
Wrestling style: Power and brawling, emphasizing high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Black Death (Double Team Piledriver with Tommy End), Chokeslam, Lariat.
Brief description: As one-half of The Sumerian Death Squad alongside Tommy End (Malakai Black), Michael Dante was a powerhouse in wXw’s tag team division. Their dominance and chemistry made them one of the most feared teams in the promotion.

Michael Elgin
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2014–2015.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in singles and tournament matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical, with a focus on suplexes and slams.
Signature moves: Elgin Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Deadlift German Suplex, Lariat.
Brief description: Known for his strength and intensity, Michael Elgin delivered standout performances in wXw. His appearances in tournaments showcased his resilience and ability to deliver high-caliber matches.

Michael Knight
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2009–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, focusing on speed and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Frog Splash, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: Michael Knight is known for his agility and consistency in wXw. A veteran of the promotion, he has delivered strong performances in both singles and tag matches, earning recognition for his exciting in-ring style.

Michael Kovac
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, emphasizing strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, German Suplex, Lariat.
Brief description: A veteran of European wrestling, Michael Kovac brought his experience and solid in-ring ability to wXw. His contributions during the promotion’s earlier years helped establish its reputation in the European wrestling scene.

Michael Schenkenberg
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in tag team competition as part of the Pretty Bastards.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, focusing on teamwork and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Suplex Variations, Running Knee Strike, Assisted Powerbomb (with partner).
Brief description: As part of the Pretty Bastards, Michael Schenkenberg has been a mainstay in wXw’s tag team division. His charisma and ability to engage the audience have made him a fan favorite.

Michael Oku
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing agility and submissions.
Signature moves: Half Crab, Frog Splash, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: Representing the UK scene, Michael Oku impressed wXw audiences with his athleticism and passion. His matches showcased his ability to connect with the crowd and deliver exciting performances.

Mickie Knuckles
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hardcore and women’s division matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, with a mix of power and technical elements.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Running Lariat, Headbutt.
Brief description: Known for her toughness and willingness to push boundaries, Mickie Knuckles brought a hardcore edge to wXw. Her appearances were characterized by physicality and intensity, earning her respect in the promotion.

Mike Bailey
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017–2020.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in high-energy singles matches and tournaments.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, blending martial arts with aerial offense.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Double Knee Drop, Tornado Kick, Standing Moonsault.
Brief description: Known as "Speedball," Mike Bailey impressed wXw fans with his incredible agility and striking ability. His unique blend of martial arts and high-flying moves made his matches standout highlights of the cards he appeared on.

Mike Quackenbush
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in technical and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and innovative, emphasizing lucha libre-inspired techniques.
Signature moves: Quackendriver (Modified Michinoku Driver), Chain Wrestling Sequences, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: As a master of technical wrestling and the founder of Chikara, Mike Quackenbush brought his expertise and creativity to wXw. His matches were celebrated for their storytelling and innovative offense, leaving a lasting impact.

Mike Schwarz
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a brawling focus.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Chokeslam, Lariat.
Brief description: A prominent figure in the German wrestling scene, Mike Schwarz showcased his toughness and power in wXw. His performances emphasized physicality, making him a strong competitor in both singles and tag team competition.

Mikey Whiplash
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in character-driven and technical matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with a focus on submissions and storytelling.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Double Underhook Suplex, Sleeper Hold.
Brief description: Mikey Whiplash brought his unique and dark persona to wXw, captivating audiences with his character work and technical proficiency. His matches combined intensity and creativity, leaving a strong impression.

Monster Consulting (Avalanche & Julian Nero)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical, focusing on teamwork and hard-hitting offense.
Signature moves: Monster Driver (Double Team Piledriver), Assisted Spinebuster, Tandem Suplex.
Brief description: Monster Consulting became a dominant force in wXw’s tag team division, combining Avalanche’s brute strength with Julian Nero’s technical prowess. Their cohesion and physicality made them one of the top teams in the promotion during their tenure.

Moustache Mountain (Tyler Bate & Trent Seven)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured in high-profile tag team matches.
Wrestling style: British strong style, blending technical wrestling with strikes and teamwork.
Signature moves: Assisted Suplex, Burning Hammer/Diving Knee Drop Combo, Tandem Lariats.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Moustache Mountain captivated wXw fans with their dynamic in-ring style and charisma. Their appearances added star power and excitement to the tag team division.

Murat Bosporus
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, competing in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, focusing on suplexes and grappling.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Bosporus Bridge (Bridging Belly-to-Back Suplex), Lariat.
Brief description: A stalwart of the European wrestling scene, Murat Bosporus made significant contributions to wXw’s growth. His blend of power and technical skill made him a respected and reliable competitor throughout his tenure.

Munenori Sawa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in technical showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and grappling, emphasizing strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Octopus Hold, Shining Wizard, Armbar.
Brief description: A representative of Japan’s hard-hitting wrestling tradition, Munenori Sawa brought his intense and precise style to wXw. His matches showcased his unique blend of technical grappling and striking ability, leaving a lasting impression.

Naomichi Marufuji
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2008–2010.
Position on the card: Upper card, featured in technical and international showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style with a mix of striking, submissions, and high-flying techniques.
Signature moves: Shiranui (Sliced Bread #2), Ko-oh (Running Knee Strike), Perfect Key Lock.
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH, Naomichi Marufuji brought his exceptional technical skills and striking prowess to wXw. His matches against top-tier opponents were masterclasses in strong style wrestling, elevating the promotion’s international reputation.

Naruki Doi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in fast-paced singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing speed and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Muscular Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Bakatare Sliding Kick, Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Naruki Doi dazzled wXw audiences with his agility and explosive style. His matches showcased the best of Japanese junior heavyweight wrestling, adding a unique flavor to the promotion’s events.

Necro Butcher
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the late 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, specializing in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and extreme tactics.
Signature moves: Tiger Driver, Piledriver, Chair-Assisted Lariat.
Brief description: Known for his unorthodox and brutal style, Necro Butcher brought hardcore wrestling to wXw. His matches were spectacles of violence, appealing to fans of the deathmatch genre and adding variety to the promotion's offerings.

Nick Gage
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, focusing on violence and high-impact offense.
Signature moves: Chokebreaker (Chokeslam onto the Knee), Piledriver, Barbed Wire-assisted Strikes.
Brief description: Known as the "God of Ultraviolence," Nick Gage brought his chaotic and hardcore style to wXw, delivering brutal and unforgettable matches. His intensity and connection with hardcore wrestling fans made him a unique attraction during his appearances.

Nick Jackson (The Young Bucks)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, primarily in tag team competition with Matt Jackson.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, emphasizing innovative double-team moves.
Signature moves: More Bang for Your Buck (450 Splash/Moonsault Combo), Superkick Party, IndyTaker (Assisted Spike Tombstone).
Brief description: As one-half of The Young Bucks, Nick Jackson captivated wXw audiences with his creative and fast-paced style. Their matches showcased their charisma and athleticism, solidifying their reputation as one of the best tag teams in the world.

Nicole Matthews
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on submissions and character-driven offense.
Signature moves: Liontamer, German Suplex, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Nicole Matthews brought her mix of technical skill and personality to wXw’s women’s division. Her ability to combine physicality with storytelling made her a notable presence during her tenure.

Nigel McGuinness
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in technical and hard-hitting matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, emphasizing counters and grappling.
Signature moves: Tower of London (Rope-hung Cutter), Jawbreaker Lariat, Arm Submission Variations.
Brief description: A master of technical wrestling, Nigel McGuinness delivered standout performances in wXw. His matches were celebrated for their storytelling and physicality, showcasing his world-class skill.

Nikita Charisma
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in tag team competition with “Pretty Bastards.”
Wrestling style: Striking and character-driven, focusing on crowd interaction and teamwork.
Signature moves: Superkick, Double Team Suplex (with partner), Running Knee.
Brief description: Nikita Charisma’s personality and charisma have made him a staple in wXw’s tag team division. As part of Pretty Bastards, he combines character work with solid in-ring performances, earning fan support and recognition.

Nikki Storm (Nikki Cross)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, emphasizing aggressive offense and in-ring psychology.
Signature moves: Fisherman Neckbreaker, Spinning Neckbreaker, Guillotine Choke.
Brief description: Before achieving global fame, Nikki Storm brought her intense and aggressive style to wXw. Her ability to connect with the audience through her character work and solid wrestling made her a standout during her appearances.

Nina Samuels
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on submissions and character-driven storytelling.
Signature moves: Gory Bomb, Split-Leg Moonsault, Spinning Neckbreaker.
Brief description: Nina Samuels impressed wXw audiences with her charisma and storytelling ability. Her performances showcased her versatility and added depth to the women’s division during her tenure.

Ninja Mack
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in high-flying and fast-paced singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, with an emphasis on innovative aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Ninja Bomb (450 Splash), Springboard Cutter, Moonsault.
Brief description: Ninja Mack wowed wXw fans with his breathtaking athleticism and creativity. His high-risk style and unpredictable moves made him a thrilling addition to the roster during his appearances.

Nixon Newell (Tegan Nox)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2016–2017.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-energy, focusing on strikes and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Shiniest Wizard (Running Knee Strike), Crossbody, Back Suplex.
Brief description: Nixon Newell’s energetic and crowd-pleasing style earned her a warm reception in wXw. Her performances were notable for their intensity and connection with fans, leaving a lasting impression during her appearances.

Noam Dar
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-energy matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with a focus on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Champagne Superkneebar (Kneebar), Nova Roller (Running Enzuigiri), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Noam Dar brought his charismatic and precise style to wXw. His technical matches showcased his grappling ability and knack for engaging the crowd.

Norman Harras
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in character-driven and factional storylines.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on storytelling.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Spinebuster, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: Norman Harras has become a key figure in wXw, known for his character development and ability to play both comedic and serious roles. His consistent performances have made him a versatile and reliable member of the roster.

Oliver Carter
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the late 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, blending speed with aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Moonsault, Spinning Heel Kick.
Brief description: Representing Switzerland, Oliver Carter brought his exciting and dynamic in-ring style to wXw. His performances showcased his agility and versatility, leaving a strong impression on fans during his tenure.

Oney Lorcan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, focusing on physicality and grappling.
Signature moves: Half-and-Half Suplex, Running European Uppercut, Diving Blockbuster.
Brief description: Known for his no-nonsense and physical style, Oney Lorcan delivered hard-hitting performances in wXw. His intensity and commitment to realism made him a standout during his appearances.

Ortiz (Santana & Ortiz)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of EYFBO.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling, focusing on creative tandem moves.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo), Cannonball Senton, Tandem Superkicks.
Brief description: As part of EYFBO, Ortiz showcased his energetic and high-impact style in wXw’s tag team division. His matches highlighted his charisma and chemistry with Santana, making them a formidable duo.

Osirian Portal (Ophidian & Amasis)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the late 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired, emphasizing agility and synchronized teamwork.
Signature moves: Egyptian Destroyer (Assisted Canadian Destroyer), Tandem DDT, Moonsault.
Brief description: Representing Chikara, the Osirian Portal brought their unique, theatrical style to wXw. Their performances blended humor with athleticism, offering fans a memorable and entertaining experience.

Oskar Leube
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2021–2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in developmental and factional matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a focus on strikes and slams.
Signature moves: Powerslam, German Suplex, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: A young talent, Oskar Leube showcased his potential in wXw through his physical style and strong fundamentals. His performances reflected his growth as a wrestler and his promise for future success.

PAC
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in high-profile singles and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, with an emphasis on agility and innovation.
Signature moves: Black Arrow (Corkscrew Shooting Star Press), Brutalizer (Rings of Saturn), Red Arrow (Twisting Splash).
Brief description: Known as "The Man That Gravity Forgot," PAC brought his breathtaking athleticism and intensity to wXw. His matches were highlights of the events he appeared in, showcasing his world-class talent and explosive in-ring style.

Pascal Spalter
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2009–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and faction-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, focusing on strength and striking.
Signature moves: Spalter Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Running Clothesline, German Suplex.
Brief description: Pascal Spalter was a consistent performer in wXw, known for his size and power. His strong character work and solid wrestling made him a key figure in the promotion’s mid-card scene during his tenure.

Paul London
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in high-flying showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, emphasizing agility and creativity.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, London Calling (Diving Dropkick), Moonsault.
Brief description: A pioneer of modern high-flying wrestling, Paul London thrilled wXw audiences with his innovative style. His matches showcased his ability to blend athleticism with crowd-pleasing performances.

PCO
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with a mix of high-risk maneuvers.
Signature moves: PCO-Sault (Moonsault), Chokeslam, Package Piledriver.
Brief description: Known for his reinvention as a hardcore monster, PCO brought his unique blend of power and agility to wXw. His performances showcased his toughness and ability to adapt to various styles, earning him recognition in the promotion.

Pete Bouncer
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in faction-based storylines with RISE and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, focusing on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Running Knee, German Suplex, Spinebuster.
Brief description: As a key member of RISE, Pete Bouncer became a standout figure in wXw’s faction wars. His intense character work and in-ring skills made him a vital part of the promotion’s storytelling and action.

Pete Dunne
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the mid-2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in high-profile singles matches and tournaments.
Wrestling style: British strong style, blending technical wrestling with strikes and joint manipulation.
Signature moves: Bitter End (Pumphandle Flatliner), Finger Snap, Forearm Smash.
Brief description: Before achieving global recognition, Pete Dunne showcased his precise and aggressive style in wXw. His performances were defined by intensity and technical brilliance, making him a standout during his appearances.

Peter Fischer
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on grappling and counters.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Crossface, Dropkick.
Brief description: A reliable performer in wXw, Peter Fischer contributed to the promotion’s mid-card scene with consistent and well-rounded performances. His technical ability and adaptability made him a valuable part of the roster.

Peter Tihanyi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, with a focus on speed and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Shooting Star Press, Tornado DDT, Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Representing Hungary, Peter Tihanyi brought an exciting and fast-paced style to wXw. His agility and creativity in the ring quickly made him a fan favorite during his tenure.


Peter White
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the late 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical, focusing on grappling and slams.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerslam, German Suplex.
Brief description: Representing the European wrestling scene, Peter White showcased a mix of power and technical ability in wXw. His performances were solid and dependable, adding depth to the mid-card scene.

Player Dos (Stupefied)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of Super Smash Bros.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing speed and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double Team Gory Bomb/Cutter Combo), Frog Splash, Springboard DDT.
Brief description: As one-half of the Super Smash Bros., Player Dos brought excitement and creativity to wXw’s tag team division. His innovative style and chemistry with Player Uno made them a crowd favorite.

Player Uno (Evil Uno)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in tag team competition as part of Super Smash Bros.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, blending power moves with comedic elements.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double Team Gory Bomb/Cutter Combo), Swanton Bomb, Sit-Out Powerbomb.
Brief description: Player Uno’s combination of technical prowess and charisma made him a standout in wXw. His partnership with Player Dos provided entertaining and fast-paced tag team matches that thrilled audiences.

Pollyanna
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the mid-2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Crossface, Snap Suplex, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Pollyanna brought her technical skill and intensity to wXw’s women’s division. Her performances were well-received and contributed to the division’s development.

Pretty Bastards (Maggot & Prince Ahura)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on teamwork and character-driven offense.
Signature moves: Double Superkick, Assisted Cutter, Tandem Suplex.
Brief description: Pretty Bastards brought a unique mix of charisma, humor, and technical skill to wXw’s tag team division. Their ability to connect with fans through both their personalities and in-ring work made them a popular duo in the promotion.

Prince Ahura
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles competition and as part of Pretty Bastards.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, emphasizing agility and character-driven antics.
Signature moves: Enzuigiri, Springboard Cutter, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: Known for his flamboyant personality and in-ring creativity, Prince Ahura stood out in both singles and tag team matches. His time in wXw showcased his blend of athleticism and charisma, solidifying his place as a fan favorite.

Prince Devitt (Finn Bálor)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Bloody Sunday (Lifting DDT), Coup de Grâce (Diving Double Foot Stomp), Pele Kick.
Brief description: Before achieving global stardom, Prince Devitt impressed wXw audiences with his precise and innovative style. His matches highlighted his versatility and laid the groundwork for his future success.

Puma King
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in lucha libre-style showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and lucha libre, focusing on aerial maneuvers and agility.
Signature moves: Diving Crossbody, La Casita (Rolling Cradle Pin), Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: Representing Mexico’s lucha libre tradition, Puma King brought excitement and a unique style to wXw. His matches captivated fans with their fast pace and creative high spots.

Queen Maya
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical, focusing on grappling and submissions.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Camel Clutch, Running Big Boot.
Brief description: Known as the "Queen of Italian Wrestling," Queen Maya brought her regal persona and powerful in-ring style to wXw. Her performances added variety and depth to the women’s division during her appearances.

RAFA
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2021–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles and factional storylines.
Wrestling style: Agile and technical, with a focus on counters and submissions.
Signature moves: Crossface, Springboard Cutter, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: A promising talent in wXw, RAFA has shown a knack for technical precision and high-energy performances. His ability to adapt to different opponents and situations has made him a rising star in the promotion.

Rambo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power and brawling, focusing on strikes and slams.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Spinebuster, Lariat.
Brief description: Representing the German wrestling scene, Rambo brought his no-nonsense, physical style to wXw. His matches were defined by toughness and intensity, making him a notable presence during his appearances.

Rampage Brown
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with strong style elements, emphasizing suplexes and hard-hitting strikes.
Signature moves: Doctor Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Piledriver, Lariat.
Brief description: A veteran of the UK wrestling scene, Rampage Brown showcased his dominant and physical style in wXw. His performances were marked by intensity and technical prowess, leaving a strong impression on fans.

Raven
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in hardcore and character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, emphasizing storytelling and psychology.
Signature moves: Evenflow DDT, Raven Effect, Drop Toe Hold onto a Chair.
Brief description: A legend of ECW and beyond, Raven brought his cerebral and gritty style to wXw. His matches and promos added a layer of intrigue and nostalgia, making his appearances a treat for fans.

Red Scorpion
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, emphasizing strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Scorpion Driver (Piledriver), Death Valley Driver, Spear.
Brief description: Representing the Italian wrestling scene, Red Scorpion brought intensity and a solid in-ring style to wXw. His performances showcased his physicality and adaptability, making him a unique addition to the roster.

reDRagon (Kyle O'Reilly & Bobby Fish)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on submissions and innovative teamwork.
Signature moves: Chasing the Dragon (Roundhouse Kick/Brainbuster Combo), Guillotine Choke, Double Suplex.
Brief description: As one of the premier tag teams in wrestling, reDRagon brought their world-class technical ability and striking precision to wXw. Their chemistry and innovative offense made them a standout in the tag division.

Reich und Schön (Marius van Beethoven & Kevin Roadster)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with a focus on crowd interaction and storytelling.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex, Assisted DDT, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Known for their flamboyant and arrogant personas, Reich und Schön were a popular duo in wXw’s tag team division. Their combination of character work and solid wrestling ability made them fan favorites or hated heels, depending on the context.

Rene Dupree
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, focusing on suplexes and strikes.
Signature moves: Dupree Driver (Death Valley Driver), Spinebuster, Camel Clutch.
Brief description: A former WWE star, Rene Dupree brought his polished style and charisma to wXw. His experience and in-ring skill added a level of prestige to the promotion during his appearances.

Rey Fenix
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2018.
Position on the card: Main event, primarily in tag team competition as part of the Lucha Brothers.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flying, emphasizing speed, agility, and creativity.
Signature moves: Black Fire Driver (Spinning Muscle Buster), Spanish Fly, Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: As one-half of the Lucha Brothers, Rey Fenix amazed wXw audiences with his breathtaking high-flying style and innovative offense. His performances added excitement and international flair to the promotion.

Rey Horus
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in lucha libre showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre high-flying, focusing on agility and innovative aerial offense.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Spanish Fly, Tope con Hilo.
Brief description: Representing the lucha libre tradition, Rey Horus brought his fast-paced and creative style to wXw. His matches were a showcase of agility and excitement, captivating fans with his unique offense.

Rhyno
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in hardcore and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based and brawling, focusing on impactful strikes and slams.
Signature moves: Gore (Spear), Spinebuster, Piledriver.
Brief description: A former ECW World Champion, Rhyno brought his intense and physical style to wXw. His ability to dominate opponents and his powerful persona made him a memorable addition to the promotion.

Rich Swann
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in high-flying and high-energy matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, with a focus on agility and speed.
Signature moves: Phoenix Splash, Rolling Thunder, Handspring Cutter.
Brief description: Known for his charisma and electrifying in-ring style, Rich Swann entertained wXw audiences with his athleticism and dynamic performances. His matches showcased his ability to connect with fans through high-energy action.

Ricky Marvin
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical and high-flying matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired technical wrestling, blending speed with submissions.
Signature moves: Tiger Feint Kick, Moonsault, Standing Shooting Star Press.
Brief description: A veteran of the Mexican wrestling scene, Ricky Marvin brought his smooth and innovative style to wXw. His performances highlighted his technical proficiency and aerial expertise.

Ricochet
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in high-profile singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, emphasizing breathtaking aerial maneuvers.
Signature moves: 630° Senton, Benadryller (Fireman’s Carry Kick), Double Moonsault.
Brief description: A trailblazer in high-flying wrestling, Ricochet amazed wXw audiences with his unmatched athleticism and innovative moves. His ability to deliver jaw-dropping performances made him one of the standout attractions during his appearances.

Rina Yamashita
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division, often in hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and striking, blending brawling with technical grappling.
Signature moves: Splash Mountain (Powerbomb), Lariat, Death Valley Bomb.
Brief description: Representing the Japanese joshi scene, Rina Yamashita brought her hard-hitting and fearless style to wXw. Her matches pushed the boundaries of physicality, earning her recognition as a fierce competitor.

Ringkampf (WALTER, Axel Dieter Jr., and Timothy Thatcher)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2019.
Position on the card: Main event, featured in faction-based and singles storylines.
Wrestling style: Technical and hard-hitting, emphasizing grappling and striking.
Signature moves: WALTER’s Powerbomb, Thatcher’s Fujiwara Armbar, Axel Dieter Jr.’s European Uppercut.
Brief description: Ringkampf was a dominant and respected faction in wXw, embodying the ethos of traditional European wrestling. Known for their technical prowess and hard-hitting style, they elevated wXw's profile internationally through their strong performances and discipline-driven approach.

RISE (Various Members, including John Klinger, Pete Bouncer, Lucky Kid/Metehan)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2017–2019.
Position on the card: Faction spanning mid-card to main event.
Wrestling style: A mix of brawling, technical, and character-driven storytelling.
Signature moves: Metehan’s Lucky Lock (Crossface), Bouncer’s Spinebuster, Faction Beatdowns.
Brief description: RISE was a pivotal faction in wXw, with their rebellious nature creating some of the promotion’s most memorable storylines. They thrived on chaos, factional rivalries, and elevating members like Lucky Kid to prominence.

Rob Lynch
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of the London Riots.
Wrestling style: Power and brawling, emphasizing strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Lariat, Powerbomb, Suicide Dive.
Brief description: As one-half of the London Riots, Rob Lynch brought a gritty and hard-hitting style to wXw. His matches were physical and intense, highlighting his chemistry with tag partner James Davis.

Robbie Brookside
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in singles and technical showcase matches.
Wrestling style: British technical wrestling, focusing on grappling and counters.
Signature moves: Butterfly Suplex, Single Leg Crab, European Uppercut.
Brief description: A legend of British wrestling, Robbie Brookside showcased his veteran experience and technical mastery in wXw. His performances were a masterclass in traditional wrestling techniques, earning him respect among fans and peers alike.

Robbie X
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in high-flying singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and agile, emphasizing innovative aerial moves.
Signature moves: Spiral Tap, Springboard Cutter, 450° Splash.
Brief description: A standout from the UK wrestling scene, Robbie X brought his exciting and fast-paced style to wXw. His ability to combine athleticism with precision made him a thrilling addition to the roster during his appearances.

Robert Dreissker
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2012–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, featured in singles and factional storylines.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, emphasizing strikes and suplexes.
Signature moves: Dreissker Bomb (Running Splash), German Suplex, Spinebuster.
Brief description: Known as "Avalanche," Robert Dreissker has been a staple of wXw, showcasing his strength and presence in both singles and tag team matches. His versatility and ability to adapt to various storylines have solidified him as a key figure in the promotion.

Rocky Romero
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in tag team and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, with an emphasis on submissions and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Diablo Armbar (Cross Armbar), Shiranui (Springboard Cutter), Forever Clotheslines (Multiple Running Clotheslines).
Brief description: A seasoned performer from NJPW, Rocky Romero brought his unique blend of technical skill and charisma to wXw. His matches were exciting and showcased his versatility in both singles and tag team competition.

Roderick Strong
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-intensity matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, focusing on backbreakers and grappling.
Signature moves: End of Heartache (Vertical Suplex into Double Knee Backbreaker), Strong Hold (Boston Crab), Sick Kick.
Brief description: A cornerstone of the independent wrestling scene, Roderick Strong delivered hard-hitting and technically masterful matches in wXw. His appearances elevated the quality of the events and showcased his signature intensity.

Rodney Faverus
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, focusing on kicks and grappling.
Signature moves: Roundhouse Kick, German Suplex, Armbar.
Brief description: Representing the Netherlands, Rodney Faverus brought his martial arts-inspired style to wXw. His matches were characterized by his precision and striking ability, making him a unique competitor during his tenure.

Ronny Kessler
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in developmental matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based, focusing on slams and striking offense.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Powerbomb, Running Lariat.
Brief description: A product of the European wrestling scene, Ronny Kessler showcased his strength and potential in wXw. His matches reflected his development as a performer, making him a part of the promotion’s emerging talent pool.

Rotation
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in high-flying singles matches and multi-person bouts.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, focusing on speed and agility.
Signature moves: Tornado DDT, Springboard Moonsault, Tope con Hilo.
Brief description: A wXw homegrown talent, Rotation has thrilled audiences with his dynamic and acrobatic style. His matches are fast-paced and filled with innovative aerial maneuvers, making him a fan favorite in the promotion.

Rott Und Flott (Nikita Charisma & Michael Schenkenberg)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Character-driven with technical and striking elements.
Signature moves: Assisted Suplex, Tandem Dropkick, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Rott Und Flott have established themselves as one of wXw’s premier tag teams, combining charisma and solid in-ring ability. Their chemistry and entertaining antics have made them a staple of the promotion’s tag division.

Roy Knight
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power and striking, focusing on brawling and grappling.
Signature moves: Powerslam, Spinebuster, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Roy Knight showcased his toughness and physical style in wXw. His matches highlighted his ability to deliver hard-hitting action and engage the audience.

Rust Taylor (Tyler Rust)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the late 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, with a focus on grappling and counters.
Signature moves: Guillotine Choke, Armbar, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Rust Taylor brought his smooth technical wrestling style to wXw, showcasing his grappling ability and attention to detail. His performances reflected his adaptability and skill in competitive matches.

Ryo Saito
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in fast-paced and technical matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing lucha libre and strong style.
Signature moves: Premium Bridge (Dragon Suplex Hold), Double Cross (Fisherman Driver), Tornado DDT.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Ryo Saito brought his exciting mix of agility and technical skill to wXw. His matches showcased his versatility and ability to adapt to international opponents.

Ryuji Ito
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, specializing in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and high-risk tactics.
Signature moves: Dragon Splash, Piledriver, Lariat.
Brief description: Known as a deathmatch legend, Ryuji Ito thrilled hardcore wrestling fans in wXw with his fearless and violent style. His matches were a spectacle of chaos, appealing to fans of extreme wrestling.

Salvatore Bellomo
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles and character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, focusing on striking and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Running Bulldog, Double Underhook Suplex, Spinebuster.
Brief description: A veteran of European wrestling, Salvatore Bellomo brought his experience and charisma to wXw. His character-driven matches added a nostalgic and entertaining element to the promotion.

Sami Callihan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in hardcore and character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and striking, with a focus on character work and intensity.
Signature moves: Cactus Driver ’97 (Piledriver), Stretch Muffler, Death Valley Driver.
Brief description: Known for his chaotic and unhinged persona, Sami Callihan brought his hard-hitting style and intensity to wXw. His matches and promos added a raw and unpredictable edge to the promotion during his appearances.

Samoa Joe
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in international showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and submission-based, emphasizing strikes and grappling.
Signature moves: Coquina Clutch, Muscle Buster, STJoe (Uranage Slam).
Brief description: A legend in strong style wrestling, Samoa Joe’s rare appearances in wXw brought his trademark intensity and technical skill to the promotion. His matches were hard-hitting and showcased his dominance as a competitor.

Santana (of EYFBO / Proud & Powerful)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team competition with Ortiz.
Wrestling style: High-flying and brawling, with an emphasis on teamwork and creative offense.
Signature moves: Street Sweeper (Powerbomb/Blockbuster Combo), Tandem Suplex, Corner Cannonball.
Brief description: As one-half of EYFBO, Santana brought energy and innovation to wXw’s tag team division. His matches highlighted his athleticism and strong chemistry with Ortiz, making them a dynamic duo in the promotion.

Sasa Keel
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and faction-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Striking and brawling, focusing on power and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Big Boot, Chokeslam, Spinebuster.
Brief description: A regular fixture in wXw, Sasa Keel’s strong presence and in-ring style have made him a reliable performer. His work in factional storylines has added depth to his character and his matches.

Schadenfreude (Chris Brookes, Kyle Fletcher, and others)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–2020.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event in faction-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, emphasizing teamwork and psychological tactics.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplexes, Assisted Cutter, Powerbomb Variations.
Brief description: Schadenfreude was a prominent faction in wXw, known for their anti-establishment antics and technical brilliance. Led by Chris Brookes, they brought a rebellious energy to the promotion, captivating fans with their unique style and attitude.

Scorpio Sky
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-energy singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on agility and submissions.
Signature moves: TKO (Spinning Cutter), Ace of Spades (Diving Crossbody), Sharpshooter.
Brief description: Known for his charisma and versatility, Scorpio Sky brought his dynamic in-ring style to wXw. His matches showcased his athleticism and ability to adapt to a variety of opponents, leaving a lasting impression on fans.

Scotty Davis
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical and fast-paced singles matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and grappling-based, focusing on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Rolling Armbar, Bridging Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: A standout from the Irish wrestling scene, Scotty Davis impressed wXw audiences with his smooth technical wrestling and grappling proficiency. His ability to control the pace of matches made him a promising talent during his appearances.

Sebastian Hackl
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Power-based and technical, focusing on striking and slams.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Spinebuster, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: A figure in the German wrestling scene, Sebastian Hackl brought his solid in-ring fundamentals to wXw. His performances were steady and dependable, contributing to the promotion’s mid-card scene during his tenure.

Sebastian Suave
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in character-driven and technical matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, emphasizing storytelling and submissions.
Signature moves: Sharpshooter, Suplex Variations, Running Lariat.
Brief description: Representing the Canadian wrestling scene, Sebastian Suave blended character work with technical wrestling in wXw. His charisma and storytelling ability made his matches engaging for audiences.

Senza Volto
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often featured in high-flying singles matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying, emphasizing agility and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Phoenix Splash, Springboard Cutter, Tope con Hilo.
Brief description: A prominent figure in European wrestling, Senza Volto has dazzled wXw audiences with his fast-paced and creative style. His high-risk maneuvers and exciting performances have made him a standout in the promotion.

Session Moth Martina
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division, often in comedic and character-driven roles.
Wrestling style: Striking and high-energy, blending humor with solid in-ring ability.
Signature moves: Death by Snu Snu (Bronco Buster), Fisherman Suplex, Running Dropkick.
Brief description: Known for her larger-than-life personality, Session Moth Martina entertained wXw audiences with her comedic antics and high-energy performances. Her unique approach brought levity and fun to the promotion’s events.

Sha Samuels
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, focusing on strikes and power moves.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Lariat, Boston Crab.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Sha Samuels brought his hard-hitting and physical style to wXw. His character work and in-ring intensity made him a compelling performer during his tenure.

Shane Strickland (Swerve Strickland)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2017–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, emphasizing agility and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Swerve Stomp (Diving Foot Stomp), JML Driver (Electric Chair into Michinoku Driver), Rolling Cutter.
Brief description: Before gaining global recognition, Shane Strickland wowed wXw fans with his athleticism and creativity. His performances were a blend of dynamic movement and innovative techniques, making him a standout attraction.

Shanna
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, with an emphasis on speed and agility.
Signature moves: Dragon Suplex, Shanna Cutter, Missile Dropkick.
Brief description: Known as the "Perfect Athlete," Shanna brought her energetic and polished style to wXw’s women’s division. Her ability to connect with the audience and deliver exciting matches made her a valuable addition to the roster.

Shigehiro Irie
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based strong style, emphasizing suplexes and strikes.
Signature moves: Beast Bomber (Lariat), Piledriver, German Suplex.
Brief description: A representative of Japan’s DDT promotion, Shigehiro Irie brought his powerful and intense style to wXw. His matches were physical showcases of his strength and resilience, earning him respect from fans and peers.

SHINGO (Shingo Takagi)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in international showcase and tournament matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and power-based, with a focus on striking and suplexes.
Signature moves: Last of the Dragon (Modified Death Valley Driver), Pumping Bomber (Lariat), Made in Japan (Sit-Out Side Slam).
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, SHINGO brought his high-energy and physically intense style to wXw. His performances were highlights of the events, showcasing his dominance and technical prowess.

Silas Young
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling, focusing on grappling and strikes.
Signature moves: Misery (Arm-Trap Backbreaker/Clothesline Combo), Headstand Arabian Press, Rolling Elbow.
Brief description: Known as "The Last Real Man," Silas Young impressed wXw audiences with his gritty character work and solid technical ability. His matches were intense and showcased his ability to adapt to various opponents.

Skayde
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in lucha libre showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired technical wrestling, emphasizing submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Arm Drag Variations, La Casita (Rolling Cradle Pin), Springboard DDT.
Brief description: A master of lucha libre, Skayde brought his innovative and traditional techniques to wXw. His performances highlighted his skill as a teacher and performer, captivating fans with his smooth in-ring style.

Skye Smitson
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, focusing on power and submissions.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, Running Knee Strike, Crossface.
Brief description: Representing the UK wrestling scene, Skye Smitson showcased her physical and aggressive style in wXw. Her matches demonstrated her versatility and potential as a rising star in the women’s division.

Soldier Ant
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in tag team and faction-based matches as part of The Colony.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired high-flying and technical grappling.
Signature moves: TKO (Fireman’s Carry Cutter), Saluting Headbutt, Dropkick Variations.
Brief description: Representing Chikara, Soldier Ant brought his disciplined and unique style to wXw. His performances were a mix of athleticism and humor, fitting perfectly with The Colony’s entertaining yet competitive nature.

Sonjay Dutt
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-flying singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, focusing on agility and innovative moves.
Signature moves: Hindu Press (Split-Leg Moonsault), Camel Clutch, Springboard Splash.
Brief description: Known as "The Original Playa from the Himalaya," Sonjay Dutt showcased his high-energy style in wXw. His matches thrilled audiences with their fast pace and innovative maneuvers, making him a standout during his tenure.

Spalter (Pascal Spalter)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2009–2018.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in singles and faction-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, focusing on strength and slams.
Signature moves: Spalter Bomb (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Running Clothesline, German Suplex.
Brief description: A regular presence in wXw, Pascal Spalter used his size and power to stand out in the promotion. His character-driven performances and solid in-ring work made him a valuable part of the roster for nearly a decade.

Spike Trivet
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2020s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in character-driven and factional matches.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, with an emphasis on storytelling and character work.
Signature moves: Blackout (Cross-Arm Neckbreaker), Rolling Elbow, Low Blow.
Brief description: Known for his aristocratic persona, Spike Trivet brought his unique character and in-ring storytelling to wXw. His ability to connect with the audience as a heel made his appearances memorable.

Spirit Squad (Kenny & Mikey)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Comedy-infused technical wrestling, emphasizing teamwork and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Spirit Slam (Double Team Powerslam), Assisted Dropkick, Tandem Suplex.
Brief description: The Spirit Squad brought their over-the-top cheerleader gimmick to wXw, entertaining fans with a mix of humor and solid wrestling ability. Their antics and charisma added a lighthearted element to the promotion’s tag division.

Sportfreunde Ost (Axel Dieter Jr. & Da Mack)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2015.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with a focus on teamwork and storytelling.
Signature moves: Double Suplex, Assisted Crossbody, Running European Uppercut.
Brief description: Sportfreunde Ost was a charismatic and technically skilled tag team in wXw’s tag division. Their strong chemistry and ability to engage the crowd made them fan favorites during their tenure.

Stephanie Maze
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2020–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, focusing on agility and submissions.
Signature moves: Running Knee Strike, Cross Armbar, Dropkick.
Brief description: A rising star in wXw’s women’s division, Stephanie Maze has impressed fans with her crisp striking and solid in-ring technique. Her dedication to improving her craft has made her one to watch in the promotion.

Steve Corino
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, often in character-driven and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and brawling, emphasizing storytelling and crowd psychology.
Signature moves: Old School Expulsion (Fisherman’s Suplex), Sliding Lariat, Superkick.
Brief description: Known for his charisma and experience, Steve Corino brought his veteran presence to wXw. His ability to connect with the audience and deliver compelling matches made him a memorable part of the promotion’s early days.

Steve Douglas
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, focusing on high-impact moves and physicality.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, German Suplex, Running Clothesline.
Brief description: A longtime figure in wXw, Steve Douglas showcased his versatility in both technical and hardcore settings. His dedication and consistent performances made him a respected name within the promotion.

Strong BJ (Daisuke Sekimoto & Yuji Okabayashi)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Main event in the tag team division, featured in international showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and power-based, emphasizing suplexes and striking.
Signature moves: Double German Suplex, Assisted Powerbomb, Lariat.
Brief description: Representing Big Japan Pro Wrestling, Strong BJ brought their physically intense and hard-hitting style to wXw. Their matches showcased their dominance as a tag team and thrilled fans with their sheer power and precision.

STRONGHEARTS (CIMA, T-Hawk, El Lindaman, and others)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in faction-based and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, blending technical wrestling with lucha libre elements.
Signature moves: Meteora (Double Knee Strike), Assisted Moonsaults, Tandem Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Representing OWE (Oriental Wrestling Entertainment), STRONGHEARTS brought their innovative and high-energy style to wXw. Their factional presence added an international flair to the promotion and created memorable multi-man matches.

Stu Grayson
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, primarily in tag team competition as part of Super Smash Bros.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, with a focus on teamwork and agility.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double Team Gory Bomb/Cutter Combo), Springboard Moonsault, Cannonball Senton.
Brief description: As one-half of Super Smash Bros., Stu Grayson impressed wXw audiences with his athleticism and explosive offense. His chemistry with Player Uno and innovative style made their tag matches must-see events.

Sumerian Death Squad (Tommy End & Michael Dante)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2013–2019.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Power-based and striking, focusing on dominance and teamwork.
Signature moves: Black Death (Double Team Piledriver), Assisted Suplex, Lariat Combo.
Brief description: Sumerian Death Squad was one of the most dominant tag teams in wXw history. Combining Tommy End’s striking precision with Michael Dante’s brute strength, the duo became fan favorites and established themselves as a premier team in Europe.

Super Crazy
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in lucha libre showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, with an emphasis on agility and counters.
Signature moves: Moonsault (Triple Moonsault), Tornado DDT, Springboard Crossbody.
Brief description: Known as "The Insane Luchador," Super Crazy brought his high-energy and lucha libre style to wXw. His appearances thrilled fans with his athleticism and innovative maneuvers, leaving a lasting impression.

Super Dragon
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, with a focus on striking and strong style.
Signature moves: Psycho Driver (Sitout Vertical Suplex Piledriver), Curb Stomp, Moonsault.
Brief description: A legend of the independent scene, Super Dragon showcased his intense and high-impact style in wXw. His matches combined technical precision with striking brutality, captivating fans of all styles.

Super Smash Brothers (Player Uno & Player Dos)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing creative double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Fatality (Double Team Gory Bomb/Cutter Combo), Double Suplex, Tandem Moonsaults.
Brief description: The Super Smash Brothers brought their unique blend of humor and athleticism to wXw. Their matches entertained audiences with innovative teamwork and dynamic offense, making them a beloved duo in the promotion.

Susumu Yokosuka
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, focusing on grappling and strikes.
Signature moves: Jumbo no Kachi! (Lariat), Yokosuka Cutter, Dragon Suplex.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, Susumu Yokosuka brought his crisp technical style and striking ability to wXw. His performances showcased his mastery of strong style wrestling, earning him respect from fans and peers.

Swiss Money Holding (Ares & Marc Roudin)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Technical and character-driven, with an emphasis on teamwork.
Signature moves: Swiss Bank Account (Double Team Neckbreaker), Tandem Suplexes, Running Clotheslines.
Brief description: Swiss Money Holding entertained wXw audiences with their unique combination of technical ability and over-the-top characters. Their performances added a comedic yet competitive element to the tag division.

Switchblade Conspiracy (Jon Moxley & Sami Callihan)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, with an emphasis on intensity and teamwork.
Signature moves: Double Team Piledriver, Tandem Lariats, Assisted DDT.
Brief description: The Switchblade Conspiracy brought their violent and unrelenting style to wXw, captivating fans with their raw intensity and chemistry. Their appearances solidified their status as one of the most dangerous duos in independent wrestling.

T-Hawk
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019 as part of STRONGHEARTS.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and faction matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on power moves and grappling.
Signature moves: Night Ride (Lifting DDT), Powerbomb, Lariat.
Brief description: As a member of STRONGHEARTS, T-Hawk brought his dynamic and powerful style to wXw. His matches combined athleticism and intensity, making him a key figure in the faction’s success in the promotion.

Taiji Ishimori
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-flying and international showcase matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing speed, agility, and innovative offense.
Signature moves: 450° Splash, Bloody Cross (Double Underhook Facebuster), Reverse Rana.
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH, Taiji Ishimori showcased his exceptional athleticism and high-flying prowess in wXw. His appearances brought excitement and an international flair to the promotion’s events.

Takashi Sasaki
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, with a focus on strikes and weapons-based offense.
Signature moves: Right High Kick, D-Geist (Suplex to Driver), Brainbuster.
Brief description: A staple of Japan’s deathmatch wrestling scene, Takashi Sasaki brought his fearless and chaotic style to wXw. His matches were spectacles of violence, appealing to fans of extreme wrestling.

Takashi Sugiura
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in strong style singles matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, emphasizing power and submissions.
Signature moves: Olympic Slam, Ankle Lock, Running Knee.
Brief description: A hard-hitting competitor from Pro Wrestling NOAH, Takashi Sugiura showcased his relentless and physical style in wXw. His matches were masterclasses in strength and precision, earning him respect from fans and peers.

Takuya Nomura
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical singles matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and grappling, focusing on submissions and suplexes.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Sleeper Hold, Bridging Suplex.
Brief description: A young talent from Japan, Takuya Nomura impressed wXw audiences with his technical wrestling skills and intensity. His matches highlighted his potential as a rising star in the wrestling world.

Tarkan Aslan
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010–2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in faction-based storylines and tag team competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on submissions and crowd engagement.
Signature moves: Crossface, German Suplex, Enzuigiri.
Brief description: As a key member of wXw’s tag team and faction scenes, Tarkan Aslan played a significant role in various storylines. His character work and solid in-ring ability made him a reliable performer throughout his tenure.

eam wXw Wrestling Academy
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010s–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily featured in multi-man matches, showcase events, and developmental stories.
Wrestling style: Mixed styles, focusing on showcasing the skills and potential of trainees from the wXw Academy.
Signature moves: Various suplex variations, Double Team Powerbombs, High-Flying Combinations.
Brief description: Representing the wXw Wrestling Academy, this team consists of graduates and trainees who compete to display their skills and earn recognition. Their involvement in wXw events highlights the promotion’s commitment to developing homegrown talent.

Team NOAH (Various Members)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often featured in international showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, emphasizing grappling and striking.
Signature moves: Various combinations of suplexes, lariats, and submission holds.
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH, Team NOAH brought their hard-hitting and technically precise style to wXw. Their matches against wXw teams provided thrilling cross-promotional battles and showcased the talent of Japanese wrestling.

Team FIST (Friends in Similar Tights - Chuck Taylor, Johnny Gargano, Icarus)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in tag and trios competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and high-flying, with a mix of humor and heel tactics.
Signature moves: Tandem Suplex Variations, Slingshot Double Stomp, Assisted DDT.
Brief description: Known for their charisma and technical prowess, Team FIST brought their entertaining yet competitive style to wXw. Their matches were a mix of comedy and intense action, appealing to a wide range of fans.

Team Riotgas
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in faction-based and multi-man matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and striking, focusing on chaotic and high-energy offense.
Signature moves: Double Team Suplex, Corner Splashes, Running Lariats.
Brief description: Team Riotgas added energy and unpredictability to wXw’s faction wars. Their brawling style and chemistry as a group made their matches exciting spectacles.

Team WXW
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper card, featured in inter-promotional and faction-based storylines.
Wrestling style: Mixed styles, tailored to highlight the diversity of the promotion’s roster.
Signature moves: Tag and multi-man combinations showcasing technical, power, and high-flying styles.
Brief description: Team WXW often represented the promotion in cross-promotional events, showcasing its best talent against teams from other organizations. Their matches served as a platform to highlight the strength and versatility of wXw’s roster.

Tenille Dashwood (formerly Emma)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2019.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division, often featured in showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on submissions and agility.
Signature moves: Emma Lock (Modified Muta Lock), Running Crossbody, Butterfly Suplex.
Brief description: A global star, Tenille Dashwood brought her polished style and charisma to wXw. Her performances highlighted her technical proficiency and ability to captivate audiences with her in-ring work.

Teoman (formerly Lucky Kid/Metehan)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2014–2021.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, featured in faction-based storylines and singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on submissions and storytelling.
Signature moves: Meteora (Diving Double Knee Strike), Lucky Lock (Crossface), Springboard Cutter.
Brief description: Teoman evolved from Lucky Kid into a darker, more aggressive persona, becoming one of wXw’s most compelling characters. His work with factions like RISE and his intense rivalries elevated his profile within the promotion.

Thumbtack Jack
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, specializing in hardcore and deathmatches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and brawling, utilizing weapons and high-risk tactics.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Running Knee Strike, Barbed Wire-assisted Moves.
Brief description: A staple of wXw’s hardcore scene, Thumbtack Jack pushed the limits of violence and creativity in his matches. His fearless approach to deathmatches made him a cult favorite among fans of extreme wrestling.

Thunder Rosa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the women’s division.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, blending lucha libre elements with power moves.
Signature moves: Thunder Driver (Fire Thunder Driver), Peruvian Necktie, Sliding Dropkick.
Brief description: A global sensation, Thunder Rosa brought her intense and charismatic style to wXw’s women’s division. Her matches combined technical skill and storytelling, captivating fans and showcasing her international appeal.

Timothy Thatcher
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2020.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in technical singles matches and as part of the Ringkampf faction.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, emphasizing grappling and holds.
Signature moves: Fujiwara Armbar, Belly-to-Belly Suplex, European Uppercut.
Brief description: Timothy Thatcher became a cornerstone of wXw during his tenure, known for his no-nonsense style and dedication to traditional wrestling values. As a key member of Ringkampf, he helped elevate wXw’s reputation for technical wrestling excellence.

TK Cooper
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in tag team competition with Travis Banks as part of South Pacific Power Trip.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, focusing on agility and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, Diving Headbutt, Springboard Elbow.
Brief description: Representing New Zealand, TK Cooper brought energy and creativity to wXw’s tag division. His chemistry with Travis Banks as part of South Pacific Power Trip made their appearances stand out.

TJP (TJ Perkins)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-flying matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and lucha libre-inspired, focusing on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Detonation Kick (Fireman’s Carry into Roundhouse Kick), TJP Clutch (Kneebar), Springboard DDT.
Brief description: Known for his versatility and smooth technical skills, TJP showcased his innovative offense in wXw. His matches combined speed, precision, and a flair for creativity, earning praise from fans.

Tommaso Ciampa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on submissions and counters.
Signature moves: Project Ciampa (Powerbomb to Knee), Willow’s Bell (Rope-Hung DDT), Sicilian Stretch (Arm-Trap Crossface).
Brief description: Before achieving global stardom, Tommaso Ciampa brought his intense and methodical style to wXw. His performances showcased his ability to deliver gripping and hard-hitting matches, making him a standout during his appearances.

Tommy End (Malakai Black)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2008–2016.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, featured in singles matches and as part of the Sumerian Death Squad.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, emphasizing kicks, counters, and strong style.
Signature moves: Black Mass (Spinning Heel Kick), Dragon Slayer (Modified Dragon Sleeper), Springboard Moonsault.
Brief description: A staple of wXw, Tommy End gained recognition for his precise striking and dark persona. As part of the Sumerian Death Squad, he dominated the tag division, while his singles performances solidified him as one of the top names in the promotion.

Toni Storm
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2016–2018.
Position on the card: Main event in the women’s division, often featured in marquee matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on suplexes and submissions.
Signature moves: Strong Zero (Piledriver), German Suplex, Running Hip Attack.
Brief description: As a trailblazer in women’s wrestling, Toni Storm elevated wXw’s women’s division with her high-caliber performances. Her matches were a mix of physicality and storytelling, and she became one of the faces of the division during her tenure.

Too Cool (Grandmaster Sexay & Scotty 2 Hotty)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in comedic tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Comedy-infused technical wrestling, emphasizing crowd interaction.
Signature moves: The Worm (Scotty 2 Hotty), Hip Hop Drop (Diving Leg Drop), Double Suplex.
Brief description: Bringing their signature mix of humor and charisma, Too Cool entertained wXw audiences with their nostalgic and crowd-pleasing style. Their appearances were highlights for fans of their unique brand of tag team wrestling.

Tracy Smothers
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often in character-driven and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and technical, focusing on storytelling and crowd interaction.
Signature moves: Jawjacker (Reverse Jawbreaker), Flying Shoulder Tackle, Crossbody.
Brief description: A veteran of the wrestling world, Tracy Smothers brought his experience and charisma to wXw. His ability to connect with the audience through humor and character work made his appearances memorable.

Travis Banks
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles competition and tag team matches as part of South Pacific Power Trip.
Wrestling style: Striking and technical, focusing on high-impact moves and submissions.
Signature moves: Kiwi Crusher (Fisherman Driver), Slice of Heaven (Springboard Kick), Suicide Dive.
Brief description: Representing New Zealand, Travis Banks brought his hard-hitting style to wXw. Whether in singles or tag team action, his intensity and athleticism stood out, earning him recognition in the promotion.

Trent Seven
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches with Moustache Mountain.
Wrestling style: British strong style, blending striking and technical grappling.
Signature moves: Seven Stars Lariat, Burning Hammer, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: As one-half of Moustache Mountain, Trent Seven brought his charismatic and hard-hitting style to wXw. His matches, whether in singles or tag competition, showcased his skill and personality, making him a fan favorite.

Trevor Lee (Cameron Grimes)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often featured in technical and character-driven matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, blending grappling with high-impact offense.
Signature moves: Cave In (Diving Double Foot Stomp), Small Package Driver, Moonsault Powerslam.
Brief description: Trevor Lee captivated wXw audiences with his unique blend of in-ring skill and comedic timing. His performances combined technical mastery with memorable character work.

Tristan Archer
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to main event, often featured in faction-based and singles storylines.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on grappling and counters.
Signature moves: L’Empereur’s Guillotine (Sleeper Hold), German Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Representing France, Tristan Archer has been a consistent presence in wXw. His technical ability and character evolution have made him a significant figure in the promotion, frequently involved in high-stakes matches and storylines.

Tyler Bate
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often in tag team competition as part of Moustache Mountain.
Wrestling style: British strong style, blending striking, grappling, and high-flying.
Signature moves: Tyler Driver ’97 (Sit-Out Powerbomb), Spiral Tap (Corkscrew Senton), Airplane Spin.
Brief description: As one of the UK’s top stars, Tyler Bate brought his exceptional in-ring skill and charisma to wXw. His performances, both as a singles competitor and in tag matches with Trent Seven, captivated audiences with their creativity and precision.

Tyler Black (Seth Rollins)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing agility and speed.
Signature moves: God’s Last Gift (Small Package Driver), Phoenix Splash, Superkick.
Brief description: Before becoming a global superstar, Tyler Black showcased his dynamic and innovative style in wXw. His matches highlighted his versatility and potential, leaving a lasting impression on fans.

Tyson Dux
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical singles and tag matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, focusing on grappling and submissions.
Signature moves: Brainbuster, Sharpshooter, German Suplex.
Brief description: A Canadian wrestling standout, Tyson Dux showcased his polished and precise technical wrestling skills in wXw. His performances highlighted his ability to adapt to various opponents and deliver consistent in-ring action.

Uhaa Nation (Apollo Crews)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the early 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often featured in showcase singles matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based and high-flying, blending strength with agility.
Signature moves: Standing Moonsault, Gorilla Press Slam, Uhaa Combination (Standing Shooting Star Press).
Brief description: Known for his incredible athleticism and charisma, Uhaa Nation amazed wXw audiences with his blend of strength and high-flying moves. His performances demonstrated why he was considered one of the top rising stars during his time in wXw.

Ulf Hermann
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in hardcore and brawling matches.
Wrestling style: Brawling and power-based, focusing on strikes and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Running Powerbomb, Lariat, Spinebuster.
Brief description: A regular in the German wrestling scene, Ulf Hermann brought his tough and rugged style to wXw. His matches, often physical and intense, added a hardcore element to the promotion’s events.

Ultimo Dragon
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in international and lucha libre showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Lucha libre-inspired technical wrestling, emphasizing agility and submissions.
Signature moves: Asai DDT, Dragon Sleeper, Moonsault.
Brief description: A legend in lucha libre and international wrestling, Ultimo Dragon brought his iconic style to wXw. His appearances showcased his technical brilliance and timeless ability to captivate audiences.

Up In Smoke (Cheech & Cloudy)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in tag team competition.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing innovative double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Partly Cloudy with a Chance of Cheech (Assisted Moonsault), Tandem Suplex, Diving Crossbody.
Brief description: Up In Smoke entertained wXw audiences with their unique chemistry and fast-paced matches. Their ability to execute creative tag team offense made them a popular addition to the tag division.

Veda Scott
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the women’s division, often featured in character-driven and technical matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and striking, with an emphasis on submissions and crowd engagement.
Signature moves: Spear, Fujiwara Armbar, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Known for her charismatic personality and solid technical ability, Veda Scott brought her unique blend of wrestling and storytelling to wXw. Her appearances showcased her versatility and ability to engage audiences.

Veit Müller
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2018–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often featured in singles matches and factional storylines.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based, focusing on suplexes and grappling.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Sleeper Hold, Spinebuster.
Brief description: A regular in wXw, Veit Müller has impressed fans with his technical skills and no-nonsense in-ring style. His performances reflect a traditional wrestling ethos, earning him respect as a reliable and consistent competitor.

Vincent Heisenberg
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2020–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in faction-based and singles matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based, focusing on slams, strikes, and dominance.
Signature moves: Chokeslam, Powerbomb, Running Big Boot.
Brief description: A powerhouse in wXw, Vincent Heisenberg stands out for his size and strength. His commanding presence and physical style make him a formidable force in the promotion’s roster.

Violence Is Forever (Dominic Garrini & Kevin Ku)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in 2022.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card, featured in technical and hard-hitting tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and grappling, focusing on submissions and tandem offense.
Signature moves: Chasing the Dragon (Kick/Brainbuster Combo), Tandem Suplexes, Assisted Knee Strikes.
Brief description: Known for their intense and technically precise style, Violence Is Forever brought their strong chemistry and aggressive in-ring work to wXw. Their matches were a testament to their skill and teamwork, earning them recognition in the tag division.

Vito Toscani
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2015–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, often featured in tag team competition with the Pretty Bastards.
Wrestling style: Power-based with technical elements, focusing on strength and crowd engagement.
Signature moves: Spinebuster, German Suplex, Running Lariat.
Brief description: A key player in wXw’s tag team division, Vito Toscani has gained recognition for his strong in-ring work and his association with charismatic factions. His performances are marked by intensity and power, making him a fan favorite.

WALTER (Gunther)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2007–2019.
Position on the card: Main event, featured in singles matches and as part of Ringkampf.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, focusing on strikes, grappling, and power moves.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Gojira Clutch, Thunderous Chop.
Brief description: As one of the most dominant figures in wXw history, WALTER epitomized strong style wrestling. His reigns as wXw Unified World Wrestling Champion solidified his legacy, while his work with Ringkampf elevated the promotion’s reputation internationally.

Waschbären Auf Koffein (Chris Brookes & Kid Lykos)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the tag team division, often in comedic and high-energy matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, focusing on creative double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Tandem Cutter, Moonsault/Diving Headbutt Combo, Assisted DDT.
Brief description: Known for their humor and innovative style, Waschbären Auf Koffein entertained wXw audiences with their unique approach to tag team wrestling. Their matches balanced comedy and athleticism, making them a standout duo.

Volker Leson
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, primarily in singles competition.
Wrestling style: Technical and power-based, focusing on grappling and suplexes.
Signature moves: German Suplex, Spinebuster, Crossface.
Brief description: A solid competitor in wXw’s early years, Volker Leson contributed to the promotion’s foundation with his consistent performances and technical skill.

Wesna
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2000s–2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the women’s division, often featured in marquee matches.
Wrestling style: Striking and power-based, focusing on suplexes and hard-hitting offense.
Signature moves: Death Valley Driver, German Suplex, Running Knee Strike.
Brief description: Known as "The Croatian Panther," Wesna was a trailblazer in European women’s wrestling. Her physical and intense style made her a standout in wXw’s women’s division, earning her recognition as one of the most formidable competitors of her era.

Wheeler Yuta
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2020s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in technical and fast-paced singles matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and grappling-focused, with an emphasis on submissions and agility.
Signature moves: Seatbelt Pin, Hammerlock DDT, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: A rising star in the independent scene, Wheeler Yuta showcased his versatility and technical skills during his appearances in wXw. His ability to adapt to various opponents made him a valuable addition to the roster.

Will Ospreay
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in high-profile singles matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing speed and innovative offense.
Signature moves: Stormbreaker (Corkscrew Neckbreaker), Oscutter (Springboard Cutter), 630° Senton.
Brief description: One of the most dynamic wrestlers in the world, Will Ospreay brought his jaw-dropping athleticism and creativity to wXw. His matches were highlights of the events he appeared in, thrilling fans with their innovation and intensity.

Willie Mack
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in high-energy singles matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based and high-flying, blending strength with agility.
Signature moves: Chocolate Thunder Bomb (Sitout Powerbomb), Standing Moonsault, Frog Splash.
Brief description: Known for his charisma and unique blend of power and agility, Willie Mack entertained wXw audiences with his energetic and dynamic performances. His appearances highlighted his versatility and crowd-pleasing style.

WorkHorsemen (Anthony Henry & JD Drake)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2020s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: Hard-hitting and technical, focusing on striking and tandem offense.
Signature moves: Assisted Brainbuster, Tandem Suplex, Running Lariats.
Brief description: The WorkHorsemen brought their gritty and physical tag team style to wXw, earning respect for their intensity and teamwork. Their matches showcased their ability to dominate opponents and deliver hard-hitting action.

World's Cutest Tag Team (Candice LeRae & Joey Ryan)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card in the tag team division, often featured in comedic and high-energy matches.
Wrestling style: High-flying and character-driven, focusing on creative double-team maneuvers.
Signature moves: Ball Plex (Suplex by Joey Ryan), Double Superkick, Assisted Crossbody.
Brief description: Combining humor and athleticism, the World's Cutest Tag Team entertained wXw audiences with their unique dynamic and creative matches. Their chemistry and crowd interaction made them a memorable addition to the tag division.

wXw Academy
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010s–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in developmental and showcase matches.
Wrestling style: Mixed styles, focusing on technical fundamentals and high-energy performances.
Signature moves: Various suplexes, submission holds, and tag team combinations.
Brief description: Representing the training ground for wXw, the Academy frequently showcases its trainees in multi-man matches and events. These appearances are designed to highlight the next generation of wXw talent, adding a fresh dynamic to the promotion.

YAMATO
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, featured in international and technical matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, with an emphasis on strikes and submissions.
Signature moves: Galleria (Elevated Cross-Legged Sitout Slam), Ragnarok (Cradle Suplex), Gallon Throw.
Brief description: Representing Dragon Gate, YAMATO brought his polished and intense style to wXw. His matches combined technical brilliance with storytelling, earning him admiration from fans and peers alike.

Yankee Two Kenju (Isami Kodaka & Yuko Miyamoto)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the tag team division, often in hardcore matches.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and striking, with a focus on weapons and high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Double Diving Headbutt, Assisted Suplex, Death Valley Bomb.
Brief description: Known for their deathmatch expertise, Yankee Two Kenju showcased their brutal and unorthodox style in wXw. Their matches were a blend of violence and innovation, catering to fans of extreme wrestling.

Yoshihiro Takayama
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often in hard-hitting singles matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style, focusing on strikes and grappling.
Signature moves: Everest German Suplex, Jumping Knee Strike, Powerbomb.
Brief description: A Japanese wrestling legend, Yoshihiro Takayama brought his intense and physically dominant style to wXw. His appearances were a masterclass in strong style wrestling, solidifying his legacy on an international stage.

Yoshihito Sasaki
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and strong style matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style, emphasizing suplexes and lariats.
Signature moves: Avalanche German Suplex, Lariat, Powerbomb.
Brief description: Representing the Japanese wrestling scene, Yoshihito Sasaki showcased his resilience and hard-hitting style in wXw. His performances were defined by intensity and a commitment to delivering top-tier matches.

Yoshinari Ogawa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and submission-based matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, with a focus on counters and grappling.
Signature moves: Cobra Clutch, Backbreaker, Bridging German Suplex.
Brief description: Known as "Rat Boy" for his cunning in the ring, Yoshinari Ogawa brought his veteran experience and technical prowess to wXw. His matches emphasized psychology and strategy, earning him respect as a master technician.

Yoshinobu Kanemaru
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical and high-paced singles matches.
Wrestling style: Strong style and technical, with an emphasis on submissions and strikes.
Signature moves: Deep Impact (Diving DDT), Figure-Four Leglock, Moonsault.
Brief description: Representing Pro Wrestling NOAH and later NJPW, Yoshinobu Kanemaru brought his veteran experience and technical brilliance to wXw. His matches showcased his adaptability and ability to excel against a variety of opponents.

Yuji Okabayashi
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event, often in tag team competition as part of Strong BJ.
Wrestling style: Power-based and strong style, focusing on suplexes and hard strikes.
Signature moves: Golem Splash (Diving Splash), Lariat, German Suplex.
Brief description: As one-half of Strong BJ, Yuji Okabayashi amazed wXw fans with his strength and intensity. His ability to combine brute force with technical precision made him one of the standout performers in the promotion.

Yuki Ishikawa
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2000s and 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in technical singles matches.
Wrestling style: Submission and grappling-based, emphasizing counters and holds.
Signature moves: Cross Armbreaker, Double Wristlock, Half Crab.
Brief description: A master of catch wrestling, Yuki Ishikawa’s appearances in wXw demonstrated his incredible technical ability and in-ring psychology. His matches were a showcase of his grappling expertise, earning him respect from fans and peers alike.

Yuko Miyamoto
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in hardcore and tag team matches as part of Yankee Two Kenju.
Wrestling style: Hardcore and striking, blending high-risk maneuvers with weapons-based offense.
Signature moves: Fire Thunder Driver, Moonsault, Diving Headbutt.
Brief description: Known for his deathmatch and hardcore style, Yuko Miyamoto thrilled wXw audiences with his fearless approach and high-impact performances. As part of Yankee Two Kenju, he brought an edge to the tag team division.

Young Bucks (Matt Jackson & Nick Jackson)
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Upper mid-card to main event in the tag team division.
Wrestling style: High-flying and technical, emphasizing tandem offense and superkicks.
Signature moves: Meltzer Driver (Springboard Tombstone Piledriver), More Bang for Your Buck (Rolling Senton/450° Splash Combo), Double Superkick.
Brief description: The Young Bucks brought their innovative and fast-paced tag team style to wXw, captivating fans with their creative offense and charisma. Their matches in wXw were highlights of the events, cementing their reputation as one of the best tag teams in the world.

Yuu
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2019–present.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card in the women’s division, often featured in high-profile matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based with striking elements, emphasizing suplexes and throws.
Signature moves: Vader Bomb, Judo Throws, German Suplex.
Brief description: A powerhouse from Japan, Yuu brought her intense and physical style to wXw’s women’s division. Her combination of strength and technical skill made her a dominant and engaging performer in the promotion.

Zachary Wentz
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, often in tag team competition with The Rascalz.
Wrestling style: High-flying and striking, emphasizing speed and agility.
Signature moves: Springboard Cutter, Standing Moonsault, Spiral Tap.
Brief description: Representing The Rascalz, Zachary Wentz brought his fast-paced and innovative offense to wXw. His high-energy performances showcased his creativity and ability to connect with the audience.

Zack Gibson
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card to upper mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Technical and submission-based, focusing on ground control and holds.
Signature moves: Shankly Gates (Arm Trap Guillotine Choke), Helter Skelter (Twisting Brainbuster), Lungblower.
Brief description: Known as "Liverpool’s Number One," Zack Gibson brought his technical prowess and promo skills to wXw. His ability to dominate with submissions and psychology made him a standout in his appearances.

Zack Sabre Jr.
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: 2010–present.
Position on the card: Main event, featured in technical singles matches and as part of top-tier tournaments.
Wrestling style: Submission-based and technical, focusing on joint manipulation and grappling.
Signature moves: Orienteering with Napalm Death (Double Armbar Submission), Penalty Kick, European Clutch.
Brief description: One of the premier technical wrestlers in the world, Zack Sabre Jr. has been a cornerstone of wXw’s top-tier matches. His incredible technical ability and in-ring storytelling have made him a perennial main eventer and fan favorite.

Zak Knight
Time in Westside Xtreme Wrestling: Sporadic appearances in the 2010s.
Position on the card: Mid-card, featured in singles and tag team matches.
Wrestling style: Power-based and striking, focusing on high-impact moves.
Signature moves: Powerbomb, Running Clothesline, Suplex Variations.
Brief description: Representing the Knight family and the UK wrestling scene, Zak Knight brought his rugged style and charisma to wXw. His matches highlighted his strength and connection to his wrestling lineage.
